Title
Review for Natural Born Killers (1994)
Number of Reviews
23

Author
David Eschatfische
No, it's not any amount of excessive violence that will turn your
stomach.
No, it's not even Robert Downey Junior's disgustingly pretentious
accent.
It's the 45-degree camera angles.  If you get even slightly seasick,
you probably won't make it 10 minutes into the dizzying camera work,
the jump cuts, the different film stocks, the discrete stereo effects,
the endless back-projecting and the color tinting.  I guarantee it will
make you at least slightly physically ill.
     Oliver Stone has been trying for years to become Hollywood's
premier mainstream "avant-garde" director.  But face it, JFK and Wild
Palms were just too NORMAL, too well regarded, too typical and, dare
say it, dry.  It looked as if Stone would never be able to wrest the
belt away from David Lynch, even with Lynch's recent failures.
     Then Stone had an idea: re-make WILD AT HEART.  Put in a hint of
what appears on the surface as media satire (so the media will love it,
of course), and stir the whole brew up with more cuts-per-minute than
the average MTV promo.  What we're left with is a bad remake of Wild At
Heart, a very, very weak attempt at satire, and a style of directing
that will batter you with images so quickly and furiously that you
won't have time to think.
     Stone throws in so many purely-for-show elements, the main
offender being relentless back-projection, that you won't notice that
the film doesn't have a plot.  A typical scene from the film featured
Mickey (Woody Harrelson) and Mallory (Juliette Lewis), the celebrated
mass murderers, looking for snake-bite ointment.
     The drug store is lit entirely in lime-green neon, with pink
glowing skeletons at the end of every shelf.  Each aisle's contents are
also labeled in Asian lettering, for no apparent reason.
    The store's HUGE "snake-bite ointment section" is out of ointment.
     So, they kill the store's sole worker when he realizes who they
are and alerts the cops.
     Then, when police show up, an Asian film crew arrives, the female
reporter spouting vaguely phallic comments like "He has a very big
gun!" and "He has been rendered impotent!"  Juliette Lewis sings a few
bars of These Boots are Made for Walking, a copy joins in on the "bew,
bew, bew" part.  Signs in the background sport witty comments about
barbiturates and other drugs, the most puzzling being a sign that says
solely "PATRICIDE: DARKNESS"
     It doesn't make the slightest bit of sense, kids, but it all comes
rushing at you so fast you won't care.  Media pundits have spouted off
about how much NATURAL BORN KILLERS is a scathing satire on the
American media preoccupation with serial killers: the final few shots
of the film (of Tonya Harding, OJ, the other easy targets) would have
you think that's what Stone had in mind.  But the film's philosophical
centerpiece, a head-to-head interview between the host of "American
Maniacs" (Robert Downey Junior) and Mickey.
     It attempts to make a statement about either the "media feeding
frenzy" of public morals, or about the fact that humans are predisposed
to kill for their livelihood (to the level of animals and vegetation
for food).  But it's only a shouting match between two lame-brains, both
of whose ideas are totally idiotic.
     Possibly the most puzzling aspect of the film is its attack on
egoism.  The script attacks two of the supporting characters, the
"American Maniacs" host and the cop who arrests Mickey and Mallory, for
having unrelenting egoism, wanting to have their names on everything.
Is Stone trying to redeem himself, or doesn't he realize his
hypocrisy?
     The constant diarrhea of images is no clue as to what Stone was
thinking either.  The images seem to have a small amount of meaning
based in the context of the film, but that's it.  I mean, for
chrissakes, a little subliminal guy in a devil outfit pops up in jump
cuts throughout the film.
     The only people who manage to maintain their dignity throughout
this mess are Woody Harrelson and Rodney Dangerfield--Woody's
controlled demeanor offsets the glut of overacting in the rest of the
film, and Rodney Dangerfield is just, well, perfect in his role (at
least that's how I always imagined him).  Everyone else seems to react
to the film's amateurish overproduction with glee, and they all ham it
up.
     Oliver Stone is living out a film-school fantasy.  He's made a big
budget picture full of images, ideas, and commentary that add up to the
same sort of absolutely nothing that most student films display.  Stone
wants so bad to be innovative that instead of using film production
technology to make a point, he uses it purely to show what film
production technology can do.
     Out of 10: I'm going to be nice, simply because the film didn't
*bore* me.  Stone was obviously working hard at creating an interesting,
innovative picture, which is much more than you can say about most of
Hollywood.  It's a pity that he can't make a *good* picture.  I give it
a 4.

Author
dnf@nauvax.ucc.nau.edu
     I just came back from seeing this film, and must say that I hated
it, then I loved it and found it absolutely brilliant!  But I think
most people will not like it since it's not at all main-stream.
     The story, of course, is of Micky and Mallorie, the M & M Killers
(as the media dubs them), and their capture and rise to celebrity
status.
     After the first fifteen or so minutes, I decided I hated the
film.  It represented perfectly *everything* about Oliver Stone that I
hate.  Stone is an excellent script-writer, as his previous works
prove, and as a straight-forward director he is pretty good.  But I
could never tolerate his avant-garde, surreal touches that he gave his
movies, because they were never well-executed.  After the first fifteen
minutes of this movie, I thought that this would be a perfect film for
anybody who likes randomly-placed diagonal, crooked shots that seem to
be placed for no apparent reason.  But then, after introducing the
characters, I saw something I never would have ever thought I would
see: a stroke of genius in an Oliver Stone film.
     The original script for the film was by Quentin Tarentino, who
wrote RESERVOIR DOGS (which he also directed and appeared in) and TRUE
ROMANCE (et al), a couple of very straight-forward films.  I imagine
that when he wrote the script for NBK, he intended for it to be done
straight-forward as well.  I don't know how much re-working the script
went through, but either way, the script is still brilliant.  It is the
rest of the film that is no longer straight-forward.  When we learn
about Mallorie's abusive father (played by Rodney Dangerfield) and her
generally messed up life, Oliver Stone had the nerve to supply an
actual *laugh track* to the movie!  The scene looks like a Sit-Com!!
But of course we know that there is nothing funny about a father who
sexually abuses his daughter, yet we hear laughter! Here's where the
stroke of genius came in.  I realized that while Oliver Stone was being
pretty non-straight-forward, it had an eerie effect, rather than giving
a feeling of miscellany (that the strangeness has no part in the
film).  For myself, when I heard the laugh track in the film, I was
disgusted.  Even more so when I realized I was hearing laughter from
some people in the audience as well.  It's one of those "Gee, I hear
laughter, so it must be funny, so I'll laugh along.  Wait a minute.
What the hell am I laughing at that's so funny?" kind of moments.
     Oliver Stone's way-out directing style is sometimes hard for me to
forgive, but not this time.  Part of the reason I am willing to forgive
is because Mickey and Mallorie were the only real characters in the
whole film.  By "real" I mean that everyone else seemed more like a
parody or caricature of a person.  For instance, Tommy Lee Jones
played a prison warden.  But this guy was not like any normal person.
Jones exaggerated the character to an extent where for some it may be
considered bad acting, but in this movie, it was obviously
caricature.  It made Mickey and Mallorie's characters easier to relate
to, even though they were so cruel, simply because they were the only
people who were anything like real people!
     And speaking of Mickey and Mallorie, I have never liked Woody
Harrelson in a movie before.  But in this, he executed his character
flawlessly (or at least pretty damn close).  And what can I say about
Juliette Lewis?!  Superb as usual.
     One of the prominent characters was a character named Jack
Scagnetti.  Now is it my imagination, or was Jack Scagnetti the name of
a talked-about-but-never-seen-on-screen character in RESERVOIR DOGS?
Mister Blonde's parole officer, by any chance?  Well in this, Jack
Scagnetti was the officer investigating the M & M murders, a kind of
flat character, so not too much to talk about....
     Robert Downey, Jr.--he finally took acting lessons and learned to
do a pretty good accent for CHAPLIN.  Once again, he delivers a fine
performance as the host (with another accent) of a program similar to
"America's Most Wanted."  Not much to say about this, other than to
note that Downey has really come a long way since his early films.
     The movie of course did have its downfalls.  Oftentimes Oliver
Stone had quite a bit of overkill with his strangeness.  Too many
times scenes were randomly inserted for nothing longer than a few
frames, just long enough for you to say, "Did I really just see a
couple of dogs tearing apart some dead animal?  Or did I just imagine
that?"  It got kind of annoying sometimes.  Either that, or I just
imagined it....  ;)
     Anyway, that's my review for now.  On a scale of one to ten, I
give this film a 7.5.  Maybe an 8.  Perhaps a bit higher.  Maybe
a bit lower.   Just see it for yourself and make up your mind, and let
us all know what *you* think.

Author
Carl Miller
     Opening scene: Mickey and Mallory Knox arrive at a remote cafe.
Mallory turns on the juke box, while Mickey orders some kee lime pie.
Already, we see the bizarre editing style which will pervade the
movie--short clips of odd camera angles, often in black and white, as
if Stone is trying to give meaning to such innocuous conversation as
"You ever had key lime pie?"
     One of the truckers starts dancing with Mallory.  Mallory says,
"Are you flirting with me?" and starts punching him.  Pretty quickly,
Mickey and Mallory go from fists to knives to guns, killing the
occupants one by one.  At one point, a waitress cries and tries to
shield herself with a coffee pot.  She dies, of course--if there's
one thing that can be said about this movie, it's that everyone whom we
expect to die dies.  Having killed all but one customer (left behind,
"to tell the tale"), Mickey and Mallory hop in their car and drive
away.
     As you can expect, you're going to see quite a few more murders
just like these.  Each one, though, is a new twist--a new and more
disgusting way to die.  Mallory beats one man and then breaks his neck
while Mickey knifes another.  Mallory cuts a man's throat, then shoots
him in the head.  Really, much more focus is given on graphic death
scenes than characterization of the victims or the killers.
     Now, a lot of ultra-violent movies are good.  A CLOCKWORK
ORANGE and RESERVOIR DOGS were great.  But as the viewer may begin to
realize as the film progesses, there isn't much more to the film than
violence.
     Of course, the film tries to delve into the reasons why Mickey and
Mallory enjoy killing so much.  Both were abused as children--in fact,
in one of the film's many laughably overblown scenes, we have Rodney
Dangerfield abusing Mallory on a sitcom called "I Love Mallory".  It's
somewhat confusing how this sitcom fits into the story--like much of
the film, there's no separation between fantasy and reality.  One
minute Rodney Dangerfield is talking about molesting Mallory to a
laughtrack, and the next minute Mickey walks in with a crowbar to
liberate Mallory.  As for Mickey, we only have a few black and white
clips of him as a child, saying, "Please, don't hit me." These are
stuck in with clips of Mickey with blood running down his face, dragons
breathing fire, and animated comic book characters.  These clips have
no meaning--they only serve to annoy and confuse the viewer.
     Tommy Lee Jones does what he can with his role, which isn't much.
Robert Downey Jr. overplays a bit, but the viewer should be used to
that by the time he comes on screen.
     To top it all of, the story just doesn't work.  When Mickey is
surrounded in a convenience store, he surrenders, only to knife a
policeman in the face.  But no one thinks to shoot him--instead seven
or eight policeman beat him with batons, for an unrevealed length of
time.  (When seen a year later, he has suffered no lasting damage
whatsoever.) No one ever thinks to shoot them--the warden even says
"every time we're ready to put them to death, they go and kill someone,
and we have to start the whole thing over again," as if policemen were
not permitted to shoot mass murderers in the act of killing.  And the
end--which I won't reveal--just doesn't make sense.
     This film is not a total disaster, probably because of Quentin
Tarantino's original screenplay.  But whatever he wrote is buried under
Stone's sensationalism--this film bears virtually no resemblance to
PULP FICTION or RESERVOIR DOGS.

Author
Chad Polenz
**1/2 (out of 4 = OK)
1994, R, 117 minutes [1 hour, 47 minutes]
[drama/satire]
starring: Woody Harrelson (Mickey Knox), Juliette Lewis (Mallory Knox),
Robert Downey Jr. (Wayne Gale), Tom Sizemore (Jack Scagnetti), Tommy Lee
Jones (Warden Dwight Muclusky), written by Quentin Tarantino, David Veloz,
Richard Rutowski, Oliver Stone, produced by Jane Hamsher, Don Murphy, Clayton
Townsend, directed by Oliver Stone.
I should have expected more (or maybe less in this case) from Oliver Stone.
"Natural Born Killers" tries to combat the evils of society by portraying
them in a very bizarre manner. It is an orgy of hyper editing and surrealism,
like a music video acted out. Unfortunately, it tries a little too hard to be
too many things at the same time. 
Like many other films, this is an attempt to go inside the mind of a maniac
and try to understand how it works. In this case the mindset is shared by
Mickey and Mallory Knox (Harrelson, Lewis), who are two crazed mass
murderers, but because of the unusual reality the story takes place in, they
don't seem much different from everyone else, which the film's essential
theme.         
The story of these two psychotic lovebirds is a strange one. Most of the
viciousness and insanity are implied. We can't comprehend why Mickey and
Mallory love each other or why they do what they do, it's all just mood. The
problem is the surrealism becomes a hindrance after a while, almost causing
for a state of vertigo.
Perhaps it is Mickey and Mallory's attitude that is so disturbing. They
aren't insane, they can tell right from wrong, but the fact they blatantly
choose to do evil deeds is shocking. People say we have become desensitized
to violence and obscenity, yet there has to be at least one thing in this
film that will disturb every viewer in some way. 
At one point the two are in need of help and are taken in by an Indian
family. Unfortunately, Mickey ends up destroying his only chance for
salvation. This is the only time the two feel any remorse, but the scene is
so short and shallow it doesn't nearly have the impact it intends to have.
The "normal" people of this reality are represented by Wayne Gale (Downey),
a tabloid journalist who is obsessed with the two, and like to exploit them.
He chronicles their actions and makes his living by sensationalizing them.
He does it so well, the media and the entire country fall in love with their
nihilism. Kids wave banners that say, "Kill me next Mickey!" and other
strange things. Eventually, Scagnetti (Sizemore), a tough cop who seems just
as corrupt and wicked as the murderers, corners them and sends them to jail.
Here is where the real exploitation begins and where the film takes a turn
for the worse.
Gale gets an exclusive interview with Mickey in jail, live, and right after
the Superbowl. Up until this point the film had been original in its
surrealistic storytelling style and bizarre reality. By the end it becomes a
standard action movie as the two escape and hold Gale hostage. The ending
itself is a little too allegorical and not exactly true to the nature of the
film.
Some of the last scenes show some clips of the Menedez brothers and O.J.
Simpson trials. I felt this was completely unnecessary and pretty much killed
the entire point of the film. Most films are about drawing your own
conclusions, but this swoops down with an actual "answer."
Still, for all its strangeness, "Natural Born Killers" is an interesting
film to watch. The direction and editing are second to none, but the actual
script itself needed improvement. 
Please visit Chad'z Movie page @ http://members.aol.com/ChadPolenz

Author
Dragan Antulov
There are probably many ways to classify connoisseurs of
modern cinema. One of them is to divide them into two very
distinct camps - those who worship Oliver Stone's 1994 film
NATURAL BORN KILLERS as the ultimate cinematic masterpiece
of its time and those who think of it as nothing more than
celluloid equivalent of an horse manure on hot desert road.
The author of this review usually avoids extreme opinions
and tries to reach middle ground whenever possible. However,
in the case of NATURAL BORN KILLERS such efforts were
fruitless. I was forced to take one of those extreme stands
and I took the latter one.
There are many reasons why my dislike of NATURAL BORN
KILLERS takes dimensions beyond those reserved for usual
Hollywood stinkers. One of them is the fact that Oliver
Stone used all two hours of this film as an opportunity to
show the world that he could master all visual techniques of
filmmaking. This demonstration includes use of both colour
and black-and-white photography, 35mm and Super 8, various
film stock, slow-motion, fast-motion, all possible camera
angles and all possible ways camera can record light.
Unfortunately, rapid editing is also part of this
demonstration and the ultimate impression comes in the form
of nausea for many unfortunate souls who were introduced to
NATURAL BORN KILLERS in theatres (same effect is less
visible among those viewers, who were wise to watch this
film on video, in much safer environment of their own
homes).
Of course, some of Stone's supporters claim that the
aforementioned nausea was the aim of this film. This nausea
was supposed to be the only way for Oliver Stone to deliver
his Message to masses, who would miss it in the hands of
more conventional director. This Message, however, was
supposed to come from the original script by Quentin
Tarantino - dark satire about American media obsession with
crime and violence. Unfortunately, this script came to the
hands of Oliver Stone and two of his co-writers - Danny
Veloz and Richard Rutowsky. Their treatment of Tarantino's
text was probably equal to the way Jack the Ripper had
treated London women, so Tarantino disowned his screenplay.
The protagonists of this film are two outcasts - Mickey Knox
(played by Woody Harrelson) and his girlfriend Mallory
Wilson (played by Juliette Lewis). Starting with Mallory's
abusing father Ed (played by Rodney Dangerfield) two of them
engage in the series of random killings. Since they always
leave a witness after their killing sprees and since they
always take credit for the murders, this pair of serial
killers is turned into media celebrities. They are equally
hounded by psychopathic lawman Jack Scagnetti (played by Tom
Sizemore) and scruples TV show host Wayne Gale (played by
Robert Downey Jr.). Their capture and trial is not the end
of their killing spree nor of media madness - Wayne Gale is
coming to prison, run by sadistic warden Dwight McClusky
(played by Tommy Lee Jones) in order to make exclusive TV
interview with Mickey that would lead to the new cycle of
violence.
If we are to believe Oliver Stone and many of the critics
who hailed this work as masterpiece, NATURAL BORN KILLERS
was supposed to be something like a wake-up call to America,
celluloid protest against media-induced national obsession
with crime and violence, condemnation of the culture that
turns psychopathic killers into heroes of popular culture.
Unfortunately, Stone's film, despite the intentions of the
author, turned into something quite different. Unable to
resist his urges to turn this film into his life-long
personal crusade against Establishment, and lacking any
sense of subtlety, Stone watered down his original
intentions by redirecting his anger and unleashing his
creative demons on too many targets at once - media, law
enforcement, family, society and civilisation in general. In
the end, this film totally misses the point and turns into
the exact thing Stone wanted to criticise - by showing
Mickey and Mallory as heroes, romantic rebels whose loves
transcends traditional morality, Stone glamorises violence,
murder and all the most virulent forms of sociopathic
behaviour.
The last and most sinister aspect of NATURAL BORN KILLERS
revealed itself to the author of this review in real life.
Few years ago I witnessed rather unpleasant scene involving
certain menacing but obviously drugged-out individual who
was trying to intimidate persons around them by publicly
proclaiming his love for NATURAL BORN KILLERS. This little
incident corresponded with series of media reports about
real life acts of violence being inspired by NATURAL BORN
KILLERS (or, to be more precise, their perpetrators trying
to diminish their own responsibility by putting all the
blame on Stone's work). And all those reports, hyped out of
proportions (like Columbine massacre and alleged MATRIX
influence), can serve certain political agendas - agendas
that manifest themselves in strengthened censorship,
suspension of individual rights and other measures that
would increase power of the same institutions Stone tried to
attack in his film. When this happens, failure of NATURAL
BORN KILLERS would be complete.
Filmske recenzije na hrvatskom/Movie Reviews in Croatian
http://film.purger.com

Author
Jon A. Webb
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS is being billed as the most violent thing
you've ever seen, the most shocking of the Oliver Stone films, etc.,
but I didn't find it so.  Perhaps I'm just becoming jaded, but I found
Stone's editing technique, in which no shot is more than about two
seconds long, to be distancing.  I walked out of PLATOON in the village
scene; it seemed to me that Stone was showing violence just for its
sensational effect.  Here, perhaps, he is trying to do the same thing
but he has over-edited the film, with the result that one sees it as a
movie rather than the commentary on our culture that it evidently tries
to be.
     Stone's films take a controversial stand, which helps marketing.
Thus, JFK asserted a particularly unlikely version of the Kennedy
assassination myth, and Stone extended it in a kind of performance art,
going on talk shows to claim he really believed it.  BORN ON THE
FOURTH OF JULY turned a bitter Vietnam vet's tragic story into a
condemnation of the Veteran's administration, US policy in Vietnam,
etc.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS claims that we have been so desensitized by
television that we would accept truly evil people as national heroes.
     Woody Harrelson is quite good as the murdering duo.  I liked
Harrelson particularly, as he drawls and slouches his way through the
part.  He seems deeply relaxed and comfortable with his character.
     Against this, Juliette Lewis seems weak, except in a few scenes
where her anger explodes; she's great in the fight scenes, and while
dancing.  But I did not think she carried the weight of her role very
well; I still can't decide if she was meant to be a moral zero into
which Harrelson's character poured his evil, or the catalyst for his
transformation.
     The scenes with Rodney Dangerfield are probably the best of the
film, and make its point most clearly.  In fact, I think Dangerfield
would have destroyed his career with this part, if he had done it
earlier.  (Dangerfield's character is just too close to his comic
personality for comfort.) It is a parody of a TV show, with laugh
track, etc., but Dangerfield plays a sickeningly evil father, abusing
Lewis's character and the rest of his family.
     There's a little too much (any is too much) of the Oliver Stone
trademark American Indian mysticism here, as there was in THE DOORS.
     Robert Downey, Jr. is great as tabloid TV reporter with the voice
of Robin Leach (I wonder if they made a deal with Leach, or is he
suing?) who makes the murderers into stars.
     This film forms a natural end (hopefully) to Stone's indictment of
American culture.  It is an attack on television style
sensationalization of murderers, etc., which in itself extends that
sensationalization.  I don't think Stone could go much farther with
this point; like overbeaten egg whites this film falls flat.  He'll
have to think of something original to do next.

Author
Ron Lawrence
     Out of all the reviews I have read of this movie, I would have to
say that nine out of ten panned it and that remaining one slept through
it.
     First of all, Stone is trying to point out exactly what goes on in
the media today in regards to how it effects people.  The main focus is
on violence.  The problem is since a movie is a form of media Stone ran
into the problem of glorifying violence while he was satirizing it.  It
is hard to ridicule violence in the magnitude that it is portrayed in
the media today with, without glorifying it yourself.
     I found when I left the movie that the violent scenes really did
not affect me that much because I was so used to seeing that kind of
violence in the media before this movie.
     This movie was a masterpiece.  It was extremely clever and
conveyed many points across.  Yes, some scenes were exaggerated and not
true to life, but sometimes you need to step out of the lines to get
your point across.  The camera angles, use of color, animation, and
flashbacks made this movie a new and interesting experience for my
eyes.  Harrelson and Lewis did excellent jobs.  I think Jones'
character could have been developed a little more, but his nose
pinchers provided a good laugh.
     Downey Jr. also did a wonderful job.  I thought Stone's portrayal
of these sensationalistic crime shows was very accurate and not
exaggerated at all.  I wouldn't be surprised if in the near future an
anchor actually participated in a murder just to get ratings.
     You could say this is a biased review since Stone is my favorite
director.  This movie made me feel less of him as a person though.  It
seemed that he thought he was the one exception to the media glorifying
violence.  After reading some reviews it came across to me that Stone
is very high on himself because he feels he sees things others do not.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Oliver Stone
Writers: Richard Rutowski, David Veloz, and Oliver Stone (based on a
script by Quentin Tarantino)
Starring: Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr., Tom
Sizemore, Tommy Lee Jones, Rodney Dangerfield, Edie McClurg, Bathalzar
Getty, Steven Wright, Arliss Howard, Ashley Judd, Rachel Ticotin, Denis
Leary, Mark Harmon, Jared Harris
"Natural Born Killers" is a tough flick to review.  On one hand, the
message that is to be presented - that the media glorifies serial
killers too much, and one day it's going to self destruct into a giant
stream of pandemonium.  But on the other hand, the film's first half has
almost nothing to do with the second half, thus quieting some of the
blows the second half tries to pull off.  Yes, the film manages to bring
its brilliant view to the screen, and the message is conveyed.  But
something is missing.  So, this is basically a flawed masterpiece.
As the films previews and general media and contreversy over this state,
this is a film about two serial killers who capture the eye of the
media, making everyone seem to love them.  The serial killers in this
film, named Mickey and Mallory (Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis,
respectively), are hick young adults who kill Mallory's parents, and
head off on a long killing spree, where 52 innocent or not-so-innocent
people are brutally killed.
The media jumps in on it when they are discovered, represented by a
hyprekinetic Aussie journalist named Wade Gale (Robert Downey Jr) who
hosts a TV show called "American Maniacs," which not only presents
coverage on serial killers past and present, but also glorifies the hell
out of them.  We don't learn a lot about Wade, since he's basically a
characateur (and rightfully so), but we do learn that he is the
stereotypical view on the reporter: selfish, egotistical ("Where are the
close-ups of ME?!," he screams out once), and amoral.  I mean, the guy's
not only married to the daughter of a rich man because he got her
pregnant, but he also has a mistress.
The film starts off with what seems to be a typical Mickey-and-Mallory
bloodbath: the two are in a little diner, are provoked by a couple
rednecks, then take everyone out except for one (chosen in a
horrifyingly sadistic, not to mention darkly comic, game of "Eeeny,
Meeeny, Miny, Moe!" - I'm trying my best to spell these, folks), who is
the chosen to tell the tale.  It's a wonderfully done scene, filled with
lots of black comedy (shots on a bullet about to hit a woman's head,
then stops, then shows blood flying against the wall), lots of cool
violence (again the bullet and the woman), and even some great music (a
great chick punk tune blares out on the soundtrack).  It's glorification
of what they do fits in perfectly with the movie, as we see the real
Mickey and Mallory viewed in the way a movie would present them,
although an Oliver Stone flick, judging from the style.
>From here, though, the film looses its way for about an hour.  Instead
of viewing the message that's supposed to be given here, Stone goes off
on an ADD-filled ride.  We see how they started out (in a brilliant
although kind of useless sequence where her family life is viewed as an
American sitcom, complete with a laugh-track).  We see how they met, how
they killed her horrible father (Rodney Dangerfield, great job) and her
passive though chiken mother (Edie McClurg).  Now this was a problem I
had with the movie: I felt bad that they killed the mother.  I was happy
when Mickey beat the hell out of the father (that guy gets NO
respect...sorry, bad joke).  But the mother was merely scared of him.
Of course she didn't do anything - the father would have kicked the hell
out of her.  I mean, I shouldn't have felt bad for the mother dying, I
guess.
The film introduces Wade, his crew, and his stupid TV show, but then
drops him and goes off with Mickey and Mallory for a bit.  This is where
it really goes wrong.  The film tries to explain the two, how they fight
for no reason, how they felt bad for the accidental killing of an Indian
who tried to help them.  But this fails.  The scene where they are
caught at a "Drug Zone" where they are buying some poison-killer since
they were bitten by rattlesnakes is effective, with a Rodney King-esque
beating at the end, and a lot of great mood and composition.
Here is where the film goes right and doesn't wimp out until the final
credit has rolled by.  We see them in prison after a year, seperated,
and Wade wants to do a live interview with Mickey after the superbowl,
mainly for high ratings.  For the final hour, we get the mayhem the film
has been waiting to deliver.  The story's boiler erupts, and we see what
happens when all these elements are mixed together.  The broadcast of
the interview prompts a large-scale prison riot, and in this mayhem,
Mickey takes out all but two guards, and takes Wade and what's left of
his crew hostage on his search for Mallory's cell, the woman he hasn't
seen for an entire year.
The ending is brilliant, with great symbolism, and brings the film to an
almost satisfying conclusion, if it weren't for the lackluster first
half.
Anyway, the style of the film is definitely different than anything I've
ever seen before in a big-budget film.  Oliver Stone, who is famous for
his quick editing (which was used to perfection in "JFK"), kind of
overdoes it.  Yes, I know what he was getting at with switching between
black/white and color, regular Hollywood cameras and super 8, live
actoin and cartoons.  But for all its worth, it's pretty headache
enducing.  He sometimes switches things at wrong times, and I kind of
feel bad for the actors and crew, since they would probably do a couple
lines, then switch it off and get a whole new camera.  And I pity the
man who had to edit this goddam thing.
The acting is very good, if not sometimes cartoonish.  Olvier Stone has
said the film is supposed to be that way, since it's a ludicrous
situation.  He's right.  It's a fable, and any way to tell it in some
kind of gritty, realistic way would ruin the impact of the film.
Anyway, Woody and Juliette are a fantastic couple, each with his or her
great perks.  Robert Downey Jr and Tommy Lee Jones REALLY go for the
high camp, and I can't even decide which one was more so.  I'm not
saying they were bad, just a tad high on the cartoonish.  I mean, when
Robert Downey Jr. talks about Elton John confessing his bisexuality to
Rolling Stone, he really goes so overboard that he makes Mickey look
sane.  I also want to talk about how funny Steven Wright was, playing a
psychologist being interviewed by Wade...well, that was pretty much it.
I didn't like this film that much the first time I saw it.  It was right
in the middle of my obsession with Quentin, and I couldn't believe that
Stone would be dissing Tarantino's original script so much.  I've read
the Quentin version, and I kind of like it better (the whole first half
is pure Stone), but I'm glad Stone directed this, 'cause it wouldn't be
as good with Tarantino directing.  But anyway, the second time I saw it,
it was the director's cut, and that, mixed with the fact that I was a
little over my Quentin obsession, I actually liked it.
With the director's cut, we get some extra footage that didn't make the
theater version of the film for various reasons.  Interlaced with the
film are a couple brutal shots, like more of Woody raping that one
hostage, and a shot of Tommy Lee Jones's decapitated head on a stick.
But we also get some extra full scenes afterwards, narrated by Stone
himself.
The one that really got me was a further explanation of the
Indian-killing part.  This seemed to deepen it, even if I found it kind
of unnecessary to the message of the film, but he took it out for "time
limiatations" (???).  There's also a scene where Mickey kills a witness
(Ashley Judd) during their trial, and a totally unnecessary albeith
entertaining bit where Denis Leary gives a rant to the camera.  We also
see the alternate ending, where Mickey and Mallory are killed by the
guardian angel guy (Arliss Howard), but the other ending was chosen
(thank god).
To bring a long story to a quick close, "Natural Born Killers" is
basically a flawed masterpiece, but at least gives its message across.
I'm not up for giving it a perfect rating, nor am I up for awarding it a
crap one, but since the positive things outweigh the negative, I'm
giving it a thumb up rating.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Raymond Johnston
Dir: Oliver Stone
Starring Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr.
Tommy Lee Jones, Rodney Dangerfield
A Regency Film distributed by Warner Bros.
     Oliver Stone's new film is a nonstop barrage of pop cultures'
images.  Like a two-hour rock video, the film switches from grainy black
and white, hand held home color, wavy video transfer, and professional
35mm film.  Each medium brings with it its own way of contemplating the
story.  Mallory's (Juliette Lewis) abusive childhood is presented on
video with a laugh track.  Her wedding to serial killer Mickey (Woody
Harrelson) is in home movie color.  Their spree across the West is
presented as a bad movie; they sit in a prop car in front of an
undisguised rear screen projector showing stock footage of different
roads.  Some scenes even include their own commercials.  Other scenes
simulate switching channels with a remote and landing on the story of
Mickey and Mallory, the murdering couple who take the  place of James
Dean and Marilyn Monroe in the hearts of 90s youth.
     While this technique of story telling is functional and sometimes
interesting, director Stone's choice of making the actors play their
lines for broad comedy is less successful.  Harrelson and Lewis manage
to pull off their sneering cynicism because it is pretty much in
character.  Rodney Dangerfield's father character manages to parody the
"Father Knows Best" cliches and has a laugh track.  Tommy Lee Jones as
the warden, Stephen Wright as the psychiatrist, Robert Downey Jr. as
the tabloid reporter all fall flat when they mug their lines and
consciously over emote.  As a surrealistic comedy (or perhaps parody of
a comedy) about the callousness and sickness of modern society NATURAL
BORN KILLERS does not succeed.
       In his scatter shot approach, there are other levels to the
film.  As a social commentary on the media the film is a little better.
It is difficult to have sympathy for the media characters who prey on
the same carcasses as the serial killers.  The fans of Mickey and
Mallory strike a much more realistic note considering the fans of
recent tabloid criminals.
      Besides using a variety of filming styles and techniques, Stone
cuts in a variety of stock footage from everything from "Leave It to
Beaver" to THE WILD BUNCH.  Music in the soundtrack is also diverse and
supportive, including everything from Jane's Addiction to Leonard
Cohen.  Among all these sounds and images, Mickey and Mallory fit right
in.  The problem with the film is that all too often they get lost in
the mix.
     Juliette Lewis plays a similar role in last year's KALIFORNIA, a
similar and more coherent film, if a less adventurous one.  Two other
serial killer couple films worth checking out on tape are THE HONEYMOON
KILLERS with Tony LoBianco and BADLANDS with Martin Sheen and Sissy
Spacek.

Author
Christopher Kankel
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS is really a very simple story that, in
essence, has already been told in BONNIE & CLYDE with some major
variations in emphasis, mood and degree.  Both films glamorize
"outlaws," in one case bank robbers and killers and in the other mass
murderers.  Both relate the story of a couple liberated by love.  But
where BONNIE & CLYDE was partial and subtle, NATURAL BORN KILLERS is
total and blatant.  Where BONNIE & CLYDE was social, NATURAL BORN
KILLERS is psychological.  What BONNIE & CLYDE hinted at, NATURAL BORN
KILLERS confronts and explores.  What Bonnie and Clyde stole, Mickey and
Mallory kill.
     To examine NATURAL BORN KILLERS as nothing more than a
psychological odyssey of realization and exposure of the frauds
surrounding them, expressed metaphorically as killing, subdues the
mysterious power this film wields.  For the most part, when Mickey and
Mallory kill, they kill all that frustrates them unnecessarily, they
kill what is trying to kill them, they kill what dissembles and cowers
from life, they kill what needs to be killed.  This mythos is at least
as old as the Hindu trinity.  Brahma created.  Vishnu preserved.  And
Siva destroyed, but he destroyed what needed to be destroyed to make
way for the useful creations of Brahma.  The following may be painfully
mundane but metaphorically so accurate, I'm forced to say it for
clarity's sake: a plumber must remove the old lead and copper pipes,
that is, destroy the old plumbing system in order to replace it with
the new one made of plastics.  Your plumber, Bonnie and Clyde, Mickey
and Mallory, and Siva are all productive destroyers.
     I think you could say without much of a challenge that religion is
responsible for more killing and death, presently and historically,
than any other phenomena.  Muslims kill Christians.  Hindus kill
Muslims.  Christians kill pagans.  Jews kill Christians, etc.  You
could reverse subject and predicate in each instance and still not be
challenged.  Religion is an orgy of killing.  The institution of the
State only misses first place for technical reasons like it hasn't been
a major player for as long or the two are frequently
indistinguishable.  "The State is the divine idea upon earth," Hegel
said, meaning it is absolute, all-powerful, ineffable, unassailable,
infallible, authoritarian and patriarchal just like JHVH, Allah, God,
etc.
     Well, what does all this have to do with NATURAL BORN KILLERS? Let
me first say that religions of this nature, in the ideal, take the
place of sex.  Consider the Catholic Church, which in its hey-dey, took
religion as seriously as any other religion or institution ever.  God
takes the place of sex as manifested in all those vows of celibacy
taken by the Pope, cardinals, bishops, monks, etc.  They forego the one,
in order to come closer to the other.  During the Middle Ages, when
this doctrine was unmitigated and unchallenged, the most repressive
regime the West has ever known in terms of scope and magnitude rose to
power.  (Parenthetically, witness Plato as well.  In the REPUBLIC, he
attempted to launch the first systematic absolutist regime.  Not
coincidentally he was something of a mystic himself, regularly
assailing the passions.) Catholicism, as policy, attacks the passions
as evil.  It sees intercourse only as a means to perpetuate the species
not as a way to pleasure.  Masturbation is considered a sin with the
sacrament of penance necessary for absolution.  This is religion, this
is authoritarianism in its essence.  As further evidence, the Nazis had
the same attitudes as the Church on these matters.  Our culture, most
of the cultures of the world have been steeped in this tradition for
thousands of years.  We can't help but adopt, even internalize some of
these same authoritarian attitudes, leading to a destructive split
between the biological and social self.
     Mickey and Mallory Knox internalized them, too, then through
spontaneous sexual awareness sparked in each one of them by the
presence of the other, discovered them, and began expurgating them from
themselves and from the world in the process unifying themselves.  It
is a straightforward liberation through sex.  As some good patriarch
once observed, "you can maintain control as long as everyone keeps
their clothes on."  M&M had a vision of what the world would be like
without contradictions.  They saw what civilization and culture and
everyday life would be like under such conditions.  "The moment of
realization is worth a thousand prayers," as Mickey says.
     As a the most consistent and impassioned critic of Western culture
there is Nietzsche applying his typical stridency to the matter: Let us
look each other in the face.  We are Hyberboreans--we know well enough
how remote our place is.  "Neither by land nor by water will you find
the road to the Hyberboreans": even Pindar, in his day, knew that much
about us.  Beyond the North, beyond ice, beyond death--our life, our
happiness....  We have discovered that happiness; we know the way; we got
our knowledge of it from thousands of years in the labyrinth.  Who else
has found it?--The man of today?--"I don't know either the way out or
the way in; I am whatever doesn't know either the way out or the way
in"--so sighs the man of today....  This is the sort of modernity that
made us ill--we sickened in lazy peace, cowardly compromise, the whole
virtuous dirtiness of the modern Yea and Nay.  This tolerance and
largeur of the heart that "forgives" everything because it
"understands" everything is a sirocco to us.  Rather live amid the ice
than among modern virtues and other such south-winds!
     As far as I can tell, this is what the movie has to say.  Its
alleged critique of the media is only secondary, tertiary, quaternary,
subsidiary for sure.  For example Wayne Gayle's first report ends with
some Gen X dude saying, "If I were a mass murderer I'd be Mickey and
Mallory," in his most excellent Bill and Ted voice.  On one level you
cd make the humdrum observation that because the media had glamorized
these two psychopaths that the uncritical, impressionable Gen X dumb
guy confused the matter and took them for heroes.  It seems more likely
that he made an independent judgement at a subconscious level
recognizing what M&M were up to and confessing that if he had the balls
to be so honest with himself he'd be just like them, killing and
destroying what deserves it.
     Let me exemplify what I've been saying by analyzing a scene from
the film, namely the scene where Mallory fucks the gas station
attendant, kills him, and then castigates him for giving her "the worst
fuckin' head I've ever had in my life!!!"  Now, I never claimed that
Mickey and Mallory had a perfect relationship, because demonstrably
they didn't, and this scene and the ones leading up to it show us
this.  Sometimes they are the source of each others frustrations, but
unwilling to kill each other, since they love each other so much and
are responsible for each others liberation, they must kill in place of
their lever.  It's no secret that in this scene Mallory fantasized that
her victim was Mickey.  As the attendant approached he took on Mickey's
character in the eyes of Mallory.  She needed to kill him because of he
kidnapped that girl in the hotel room and was having secret fantasies
about her while making love to Mallory.  Upon discovery, Mallory views
this as a betrayal, judges him, and commutes his sentence on someone
else.
     The style of the movie is a whole 'nother matter that I won't get
into very deeply but surely it is partially responsible for its power.
Let me just say that its editing has the opposite effect of a Western
with shots that linger forever on a salon entrance or the like
suggesting the expansiveness, barreness and boredom of the frontier
lifestyle.  The rapid succession of all those 8mm, 16mm, 35mm images
from various perspectives with a soundtrack sometimes in sync and
sometimes out of sink instills a skittish, frenetic mood.  Also,
Jungian archetypes abound.  These can't help but trigger deep
psychological responses we can barely understand especially when they
flash across the screen for barely a few frames.
     Some of the best scenes and lines that come to mind.(quotes are
paraphrased only):
     Mickey to Mallory: "One of these days I'm gonna be cummin' for
you," in prison, while Mallory jacks Mickey off.  Semen is a symbol for
great potential and things to come.  At the time they haven't yet had
sex nor have they killed anyone yet.  The two of course go hand in
hand.  For an even more explicit semen scene see SILENCE OF THE LAMBS.
     Mickey during his marriage to Mallory: "As creator of my universe,
I pronounce us man and wife."  The way Woody delivers this line is truly
haunting, but telling, too.  It reveals M&M are well on their way to
expunging all their destructive tendencies and replacing them with
positive ones.  This is what Mickey means by "creator of my universe,"
he is giving himself or creating for himself healthy attitudes.  It is
not necessarily a schizophrenic retreat into solipsism as it first
appears.
     Scagnetti's first meeting with Mallory is through her pubic hair
he plucks from the gas station attendant's mouth.
     The Indian Sage releasing Mallory's father, who was reincarnated
as a snake: "Old man, go be a snake," after telling his "snake story"
that ends with "Bitch, you knew I was a snake."
     After Mickey shoots this sage to death during a bewildering
nightmare, Mallory says, "You killed LIFE!!!"  This is another telling
quote because it implies they didn't see themselves as killers of
life.  Then what were they killing up to that time? In some case just
those zombies faking their way through life, the living dead, as it
were.  In other cases, all the anti-life forces, the cops and their
parents.
     The butterfly just before the movie shifts into the prison.  It of
course symbolizes rebirth.
     Dr. Emil Reingold, as portrayed by Steven Wright, passing
judgement on M&M: "Mickey and Mallory know the difference between right
and wrong, they just don't give a damn."  This is reminiscent of
Nietzsche's whole philosophy, and maybe a direct reference to his
BEYOND GOOD AND EVIL.
     Mickey: "The rabbit says the moment of realization is worth 1000
prayers."
     Mickey (again in his interview): "Me and you, we are not the same
species."
     Notice when the escape is in progress we get some role reversals
in terms of leadership and control.  Mickey the prisoner becomes the
leader of his little gang.  The wardens become prisoners and the
civilians like Wayne Gayle and his producer follow the leader, no
matter who it is.
     What an incredible transformation this is.  He got the feeling and
he couldn't contain himself.  What a feeling.  That feeling of
metaphysical freedom that you can create your own universe.
     Mickey when almost caught in a dead end, "Think, think, think,
think." Go figure it out.
     Dwight (Tommy Lee Jones) in general, because he may be the sickest
fuck in the whole film.  His whole attitude can be summed up with,
"Destroy them!!!"

Author
Nizam Ahmed
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS was released in Britain in January and is
shortly to get its video release.  However, considering the hooplah of
publicity it received concerning the subject matter, and the new tough
stance on violence by the British Board of Film Classification, it may
not be released at all.  RESERVOIR DOGS took two years to appear on the
small screen, so things don't bode well for Oliver Stone's relentless
depiction of two serial killers on the rampage.
     The film purports to be a bizarre, twisted look at the life and
killings of Mickey & Mallory Knox, and in particular attempts to
concentrate on the media feeding frenzy that turns them into prime-time
TV celebrities.  We see how they got together in a brilliant parody of
US TV sitcoms, seen through the broken memory of Mallory (Juliette
Lewis).  Their killing spree down the highways of the midwest is
documented from th point of view of top-rated docudrama American
Psychos, fronted by a manic Robert Downy Jr.  We see their downfall and
imprisonment at the hands of an obsessed cop who's just as twisted as
the prey he hunts, and an amazing climax that stokes up the excitement
to boiling point.
     Oliver Stone uses the screenplay (originally by Quentin Tarantino)
to throw every cinematic technique in the book at the viewer.
Flashbacks, video montages, back-projection, fast-cutting, black and
white, monotone, and the weirdest camera angles you're ever likely to
see combine to give you a visual bombardment that leaves you feeling
exhausted at all the images you have had to take in.  I get the
impression this was a deliberate ploy by Stone - you're supposed to be
looking inside the head of a serial killer here, it's bound to be
exhausting.  The only problem is, he uses it to overkill.  It's not
just the nutters in the film who get this technique to serve as
"thought bubbles," the entire film is enveloped in it.  If Stone is
trying to suggest that everyone's a potential murderer, fine, but give
the viewer the chance to work it out for themselves.
     Woody Harrelson as Mickey Knox is brilliant, absolutely faultless,
and Juliette Lewis is disturbingly convincing as Mallory.  She seems to
be making a habit of playing disturbed females. "Cheers" will never be
the same again.  Robert Downey Jr hams it up well as the supposed
villain of the piece, although a film where two convicted serial
killers are the heroes is a strange inversion.  I suppose it mirrors
the idea that the "media made them superstars".  Another reason for
seeing this powerful but flawed film is a thundering soundtrack, that
echoes the imagery of the film in its loud, in-your-face style.  Rap,
country, heavy metal, it all just seems so right.
     In the end though, it all depends on whether you will succumb to
Stone's unique brand of moralizing.  PLATOON was hardly subtle, but it
won Oscars.  This is even less subtle and very heavy-handed in its
criticism of the media.  There are scenes which reach farcical
proportions in their attempts to "visualize" the media celebrity idea.
But their is a certain pulp poetry in here somewhere, and it certainly
stands out, if not head and shoulders, at least shoulders above the
other films of the year.

Author
Eric Walker
When NATURAL BORN KILLERS premiered in 1994, it created a storm of controversy
over its controversy.  This was the ultimate stab at our media-saturated culture
-- the story about how a pair of mass murderers would become the hottest
sensation since O.J. Simpson, with the help of a sleazy TV reporter who glorifed
them.  There was talk about "Mickey and Mallory" copycat killers, about the
movie's over-the-top violence, and Oliver Stone's use of ground-breaking,
MTV-style editing...
...or at least, that's what the producers of NATURAL BORN KILLERS want us to
think.
It's probably not surprising to see how many people have fallen for the lure of
this film, because it may well be suited for Oliver Stone and his "in-your-face"
style.  Stone's filming style has never been subtle; however, after the success
of PLATOON it's seemed as if he has gotten more and more over-the-top as his
fame (and his ego) spreads.  Each of his films after that have become more
blatant, as they rubbed our noses in their "messages" and dragged us through the
dirt with them.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS, then, was the culmination (so far) of
Stone's work, in which he abandoned all subtlety and attempted to blow us away
with a cinematic shotgun.  He pulled out all the stops to shock us and
supposedly "open our eyes."  In his promotional interviews, Stone claims that
the film came from a couple of years in his life when he was feeling nihilistic,
depressed, with an attitude of "fuck everything."  So he put it on film, and
this is what we got.
Stone's remarks about how the film was unvairly judged have focused excusively
on its violent content.  Unquestionably the film *is* violent, and like
everything else the violence goes over the edge.  But what Stone doesn't
mention, or even take the time to defend, is the way everything in the movie is
so overblown, so outrageous, that the film stops being "shocking" and
"eye-opening" and instead becomes a numbing special-effects display, drowning
the film's "message" with the flashy visuals and reducing the viewer's sympathy
for it to nil.  It's an overblown, violent, live-action cartoon attempting to
stretch reality to the point of satire.  Unfortunately, it goes too far.
The "Director's Cut" of the film, now available on video, restores about three
minutes of footage that Stone had to cut from the original.  He gripes
repeatedly about how the MPAA representatives who saw it couldn't pin down any
"one particular scene" that upset them; rather, he claims, it is the entire aura
of "chaos" emanating from the film that they found offensive.  As such, the
scenes deleted from the film aren't any more violent or offensive than the rest
of the movie, and most of them don't add to or detract from its content.  The
reason they were cut was because they seemed (at the time) to be *especially*
shocking.  In particular, there is a clip, lasting perhaps three seconds or
less, of Mickey raping a hostage girl in a motel room.  At the film's climax,
there is the much-talked about scene where a gun shoots a hole right through a
person's hand, and the camera actually sees through the hole.  These two scenes
are indeed "shocking" when taken by themselves, out of context.  However, their
insertion into a two-hour-long montage of fast-cut images tends to dull their
effect, so that the viewer doesn't do much more than raise his or her eyes when
we see the girl in question being raped.  It happens so fast that we don't have
time to feel any emotion for her, and indeed the scene is completely forgotten
(by the story itself, anyways) five minutes later.
One might say that this is a deliberate effect of the film, as well as a comment
on the way the quick-cut editing style (popularized, of course, by MTV) has
supposedly "numbed" audiences to the point where they barely feel anything at
all.  Oliver Stone is trying to make us look at ourselves.  "Look at you!
You're so numb that you don't even care about a woman being raped on-screen!"
But unfortunately, neither does he.  We are indeed numbed by the intensity of
this movie...perhaps too much so.  We're so numb, in fact, that we aren't even
able to think about the film at all.  Furthermore, Stone has made his message so
obvious and so simplistic -- "The unending media barrage has turned us into a
society of unfeeling zombies" -- that there isn't very much there for us to
think about.  He's put so much effort into dazzling our eyes with unconnected,
apparently random transitions to black-and-white images, animation, high-quality
visuals, grainy TV images, superimposed surreal images, and every other
cinematic trick in the book that we're left with little more than a special
effects show.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS follows in the footsteps of MTV: rather than
exposing it for the hollow shell it is, it wallows in that same hollowness.
This is why audiences flocked to see this film, despite the fact that many of
these same people would not even consider watching so-called "avant-garde"
movies that use the same effects to make a much more subtle point.  Will the
audience of NATURAL BORN KILLERS suddenly have a desire to go out and see ANNIE
HALL or Godard's BREATHLESS?  How come, for that matter, there have been no
other "mainstream" films that try to work in the same visual style as this one?
Meanwhile, the restored footage does not change the film at all.  If you liked
it before, you'll still like it; if you were disappointed before, you'll still
be disappointed.  There are a few brief scenes that add some detail to Mickey's
life as opposed to Mallory's; we see the death of his father and we get hints of
how he became so depraved and soulless.  The scene of the prison riot is
expanded, and many more shots of the rioting prisoners are included, complete
with some impressive stuntwork and and another grisly image involving a severed
head.  The coffee-shop massacre at the beginning of the film is also extended
slightly, and you'll note several other shots included in the new cut.  Oddly,
the Nine Inch Nails music from "Burn" is removed from the end, and instead the
entire music video is included in the companion videotape.
One commentary on the soundtrack: accompanying the additional scenes, especially
during the prison riot, Stone includes more music from Nusrate Fateh Ali Khan.
This is obviously an attempt at irony on his part.  Nusrat is one of the most
famous "qawwali" singers of the Muslim faith, and his songs are joyous
celebrations of Life, Spirit, and God.  By using this music as the background
for an excercise in nihilism such as NATURAL BORN KILLERS, Stone is attempting
to show us how satirical the whole thing is: using music of life to counter the
images of chaos and death.  While this is great music, I fear Stone is aiming
far over the heads of most of the audience of this film; it's doubtful that a
great deal of the viwers of this film have never even heard of Nusrat Fateh Ali
Khan.  And despite the inclusion of his music on the film's much-touted
soundtrack, I don't think many people are going to go out of their way to hear
more of his music.  It's their loss; but it's also a display of contempt on the
part of Oliver Stone.  Is he aiming for the "intellectuals" in the audience --
the ones who will actually get the joke and "understand" the movie?  If so, then
I don't like his attitude.
The second video of this two-tape collection consists of out-takes and rejected
scenes from the film, as well as the Nine Inch Nails video "Burn" (as mentioned
earlier) and a series of comments on the making of the film and the reaction to
it, from Oliver Stone, Woody Harrelson, Tommy Lee Jones, and others.  The cut
scenes are interesting, in that they would have indeed added to the plot of the
movie; however, Stone cut them because he felt that they did not contribute
towards the plot development and the evolution of the characters of Mickey and
Mallory, the way that he wanted them to go.  This was a wise move on his part,
though it also displays more of the movie's weaknesses.
One especially disappointing scene involves the courtroom trial of Mickey and
Mallory, in which Mickey is allowed to defend himself and cross-examine a
witness in the case...one of the eye-witnesses to his own crimes.  The idea of a
murderer being allowed to defend himself probably struck Stone (and the writer
of that scene, Quentin Tarantino) as an interesting piece of satire (especially
in the way the courtroom scene ends), but this particular sequence is so
ridiculous that its exclusion from the film was a wise move on Stone's part.
Unfortunately, this scene also fails on a different level.  The story of NATURAL
BORN KILLERS includes the idea that the American public could become infatuated
with a pair of mass murderers through a barrage of media hype, and given the
state of today's cultyre, this may not be completely impossible.  But the movie
doesn't develop this angle enough.  We do get a look at the sleazy producer of
"American Maniacs," as well as scenes of people who adore Mickey and
Mallory...but this whole aspect of the film is still shallow.  I was hoping that
the courtroom scene would have been able to flesh out this aspect of the film,
by showing how millions of people could focus so intently on a superficial media
event such as one sensational murder trial (I needn't mention the real-life
example where this came from), but it barely touches on this at all.
As for Oliver Stone's own commentary on the movie, as well as the interviews
with Woody Harrelson, Tommy Lee Jones, Juliette Lewis, et al...they don't do
anything to shed a new perspective on NATURAL BORN KILLERS, any more than the
additional footage and out-takes.  Everyone dewells on the public's reaction to
fhe film, decrying the idea that it is "too violent" and that it is an
"exploitation" picture.  However, Tommy Lee Jones' comments have to be heard to
be believes, especially when he compares it to great works of art and mentions
Moliere as an example.
Jones also makes a comment about how Oliver Stone's humility and
self-deprecation is so exemplary, and how Stone is such a modest person...but
then, one should consider just WHO supervised this entire video production in
the first place.  It is indeed a commentary on Oliver Stone, but it certainly
shows him to be anything but humble.
In the end, the director's cut of NATURAL BORN KILLERS is going to be received
in the same fashion as the so-called "director's cuts" of BASIC INSTINCT, or any
number of so-called "director's cuts" appearing on the video shelves nowadays.
It does contain some new footage that we didn't see in the theater, but this new
footage does not change the film at all and is, in fact, completely unnecessary.
It merely continues the saga of NATURAL BORN KILLERS, and tells us what the film
is REALLY about.
It's about Oliver Stone's ego, and it's about Hollywood trying to make big bucks
by cashing in on the so-called "controversy" over an overrated, overhyped,
overblown issue...an issue that is only controversial because Hollywood created
that controversy.
In that respect, one might easily say that NATURAL BORN KILLERS truly is a movie
for the 1990s.

Author
L. G. Brossa
     At a time when the average citizen finds themselves surrounded by
real and imagined violence, Oliver Stone and associates have propelled
film violence beyond all previous rationalizations.  In his most recent
film "Natural Born Killers", the public is not just treated to a
panoply of gratuitous savagery, but also threatened with an
unprecedented wave of copycat violence.  As the film BONNIE AND
CLYDE, became the rebellious cult classic for the Sixties generation,
the psychopathic characters of Mickey (Woody Harrelson) and Mallory
(Juliette Lewis), promise a plethora of violent role playing for
rudderless youth of the Nineties.
     What is most impressive about Stone's recent contribution to our
cultural miasma, is the confused attempt to cloak this orgy of
unrelenting violence, within modern society's apparent inability to
control human conflict.  The audience is driven from one social malady,
to another, without a moment's reflection.  Of course, we're supposed
to intuit (with the subtlety of a bloodied sledge-hammer) that Mr.
Stone's artistic mission is to meld contemporary hyper- media
technique, with a message that America's drowning in brutality.  He
hides behind the idea of exposing the media's glorification of
mass-murderers, but only succeeds in accelerating the film's audience
down an interstate highway of ultra-violence!
     To the seasoned film freak, NATURAL BORN KILLERS is nothing more
than a synthesized high-tech version of CLOCKWORK ORANGE meets
BONNIE AND CLYDE.  Unfortunately, few young adults will have the
historic reference to gain from this bloody social commentary.
     The idea that our children have become innocent victims of the
Saturday morning cartoons, is alluded to with interspersed imagery of
these two murderers, rampaging through scenes as cartoon alter-egos.
This linkage of media with acts of youth violence, is so-o-o perceptive.
I will not hold Mr. Stone accountable for abrogating his
responsibility as his art might inadvertently impact the influential
craniums of today's youth.  I will not accuse him of hypocrisy, for
having used the same technologies to exploit the minds of the unwitting
audience; those same media techniques he purports to expose in his
film!  However, I will hold him morally accountable for the emulated
murders, that are sure to result from this film's release.
     I was surprised to find Mr. Stone joining the ranks of
media-maggots, who incessantly gorge themselves upon the limbs of
America's victims of murder ... all in the name of social commentary.
It was extremely disheartening to find the same brilliant artist--who
actually brought tears to my eyes in his production of JFK--succumb to
the production of the garbage entitled NATURAL BORN KILLERS.  I will
concede that the direction is impeccably brilliant.  Where else can you
utilize unflinching events-per-second editing, advanced image morphing,
cartoons and state of the art audio mixing, all devoted to the heedless
slaughter of numerous innocents?
     Like so many other "geniuses" in the film industry, the likes of
Oliver Stone will hide behind artistic temperament, thus avoiding moral
responsibility to their viewing public.  That same public that will
have to pay more--as a result of his self aggrandizement--than the
price of a ticket because of this film.  Like any other engineers of
social policy, the "Oliver Stones" remain economically buffered to the
devastating after-blast of their art.  I only wish, they someday find
themselves abandoned on the same highway of murderous images, they so
generously pour into the minds of pliant youth!
     In light of my obvious distaste for this man's film, I would ask
that every serious-minded individual, take the time to view this film.
Criminologists, law enforcement agents, psychotherapists, political
scientists and anyone concerned with human welfare, should take the
time to view this film.  You'll be forewarned as to what will no doubt
be a quantitative shift in mass-murders, throughout this nation.  True,
there will be scant evidence as to this films direct culpability in
each prospective murder scene.  Be assured, many of these murderers,
will have had more than coincidental knowledge of NATURAL BORN
KILLERS.
     Should you quickly dismiss my warning, ask why this movie devoted
so much attention to media's exploitation of violence, and the public's
ongoing preoccupation with it?  Could it be, Oliver Stone also
perceives the disappearing line between reality and phantasy in
high-technology cultural expression? That media's influence over
society is inseparable from the realities it portrays.  For my part,
I'm praying that my anxiety is the result of this film's powerful
imagery ... nothing more.
     At a time in history, when we all risk total immersion into a
swirling cesspool of uncontrolled societal violence; as our government
responds to public outrage at rampant crime, with counterproductive
criminal-code legislation; while grade schools struggle with ever
pervasive violence from errant students; and when the shrinking world
is ever more dependent upon the guidance of insightful men and woman,
we find in the midst of our entertainment industries ... natural born
traitors.
All threaded responses should be forwarded to
.  The reader is welcome to cross-post this
article to relevant discussion groups.
NOTICE!!!  No other reproduction and/or distribution rights--outside
Internet medium--is inferred by the public posting of this material.
Any form of commercial reproduction and/or distribution of the material
contained herein is expressly forbidden without the authors written
consent.

Author
Vijay Ramanujan
     The plot: Two psychos ride around killing people.  No one's chasing
them.  No one really seems to care that they exist.  Oh, yeah, I nearly
forgot.  They were both abused as children, but mostly in black and
white.  A newsman wants to interview them and a prison warden wanders
around looking confused and sounding threatening, but not really saying
much worth remembering.  Lots of people get shot, some people get
stabbed, and some people even get punched to death.  Hitler marches on
Poland.  Don't ask.
     For years I have wondered how reviewers can pan a movie and give
it ratings of 1.5/4 or 2/5.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS provides the answer.
You must leave room on the bottom end of the scale for movies this
bad.  When it comes to ratings, NATURAL BORN KILLERS pretty much
defines the 0.
     First the positive.  Juliette Lewis salvages a part clearly
written by either two different people or by a schizophrenic.  She is
bashful, wicked, pleasant, cruel, harmless and vulnerable.  Yet,
somehow, she pulls it off.  Robert Downey Junior is great as a pyshotic
telejournalist who plans to make a bundle off of this pair of maniacs
by manipulating their image and interviewing them live.  Soundtrack was
nice, and I saw it at a discount theater.  Not much else to say here.
     Where to start?  When Janet Maslin said that this movie relied on
sophistry more than poetry, she hit the nail on the head.  The main
goal of this movie seems to be to prove to us what a great artist
Oliver Stone is.  He seems to have deluded himself into thinking that
if he can throw a million visuals at us in two hours, he has proven
himself to be the greatest director alive.  Only the strong will
survive.  Unfortunately, in trying to meet this aim, he overlooked the
portion of the director's handbook which dealt with relevancy.  Why do
we see Hitler's army marching in the background while Micky and Mallory
have sex?  Why is it necessary for Micky to watch the Oliver Stone
penned (and offensively racist) MIDNIGHT EXPRESS?  Who came up with the
idea of showing Mallory's breasts while Micky talks about why he is a
killer?  And what do the damn Coca-Cola polar bears have to do with
anything?  A lack of visual coherency doomed this movie from the start.
The visual elements rarely coincided with the thematic elements in the
movie.  Truly adept directors can carry off the odd visuals (David
Lynch, Tim Burton, Barry Levinson in TOYS) by making them a part of the
movie.  Stone did not do this.
     The second major failing of the movie was its basic
pointlessness.  My first, second and third reactions after seeing this
movie were "Who cares?", "Why did I pay to see this?" and "Can I get my
money back?"  I am hoping, for Oliver Stone's sake, that this was not
a satire.  It did not have the wit, the sarcasm, the subtlety or the
bite of good satire.  In fact, there was nothing in the movie that I
could latch onto as satire at all, except by the loosened definition of
satire that Oliver Stone seems to have hinted at in his interviews and
articles surrounding this movie.
     If it is not satire, what is it?  A powerful drama?  No, then it
would have been KALIFORNIA, a much better movie with a similar plot
(but no media types involved).  What that movie achieved through stark
realism and tight story-telling this movie loses in a diarrhetic wash
of tasteless jokes and pointless violence.  It fails as an indictment
of the media through medium more than anything else.  He is fighting
fire with fire, trying to criticize the media's sensationalistic
commercialism and sensory overkill through sensationalistic
commercialism and sensory overkill.  History has taught us that if the
media is to blame, than Oliver Stone is the guiltiest of all.  He seems
to criticize the media for creating murderer celebrities.  Well, he has
just created two more.  Offensive would be a mild word to use here, but
isn't that half of what the goal was?  At least I'm talking about it,
right?
     Now, I shouldn't delude you into thinking that if those problems
had been cleared up that this would have been a good movie.  In truly
great movies of this kind, there is an element of suspense.  This
didn't have one.  The portion of the movie dealing with the killings
has all the suspense of the baseball negotiations.  We know what's
going to happen, and frankly, we aren't given much to care about either
way.  Only one victim is on screen long enough to become something more
than another body to be thrown at the front row patrons, and even he is
reduced to another stereotypical portrait of the wise old native.  The
only tension between our two leads surrounds the fruitless question "Do
you think I'm sexy?"  This of course leads to some wonderfully
amateurish dialogue that any twelve-year-old will get a kick out of.
There is no element of chase, as the lawmen only enter the movie
seconds before the Knoxs are captured.  Once the murderers are
captured, the movie only goes further downhill.  There is no sane
character to offset the insanity of the leads.  There is no conflict,
as no one seems to really be plotting towards any kind of an end. (Let
alone the screenwriter or director.)  There is no drama, because all
realism has been cast aside.  There is nothing much to hand onto, and
nothing much worth watching.  This is not a movie ruined by bad
decisions, but a movie that should never have been made, made worse by
all the stupidity displayed by director, editor et al.
     But this movie does one positive thing.  It has added one more
rule to the list of rules that govern action/adventure movies.
Policemen must count to ten and sing the national anthem silently
before firing on an armed and dangerous criminal who has just started a
killing spree.  Yes, that's right, with a half a dozen or more guns
pointed at his head, our unarmed "hero" ... well, I'll leave you to
guess.  Need a hint?
     So what was the point of this movie?  Abused children lose all
sense of right and wrong?  It's all because of Geraldo?  That with enough
hype you can people to see just about any crap that you throw onto the
big screen?  I myself am thinking that it is probably the last one.
     And just wondering.  Anyone else bothered that Stone used the clip
of O. J. before the man has even had a trial?  I guess that makes O. J. a
NATURAL BORN KILLER.  Trial by Oliver Stone?  Even the Puritans would
have flinched at the thought.

Author
James Berardinelli
Date Released:  8/26/94  
Running Length:  1:59 
Rated:  R (Violence, language, sexual situations, mature themes, 
        excessively gimmicky photography) 
Starring:  Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr., 
           Tommy Lee Jones, Tom Sizemore  
Director:  Oliver Stone 
Producers:  Jane Hamsher, Don Murphy, and Clayton Townsend 
Screenplay:  David Veloz, Richard Rutowski, and Oliver Stone based 
             on a story by Quentin Tarantino 
Cinematography:  Robert Richardson 
Music:  Trent Reznor 
Released by Warner Brothers 
     Despite his reputation as one of America's foremost "serious"
filmmakers, Oliver Stone's name under the "director" caption does not
guarantee a good movie.  I learned that lesson while enduring the
seemingly-endless tedium of THE DOORS, and was reminded of it during
some of the long, drawn-out portions of JFK.  However, nothing that
Stone has directed--or misdirected--prepared me for the grotesque
mess that is NATURAL BORN KILLERS.
     Reportedly, Quentin Tarantino (who is credited with the story) was
upset by the treatment accorded his idea.  His reaction is
understandable.  While it's impossible to tell what kind of movie this
would have been served up "straight," it's a safe bet that it couldn't
have been worse.  In its current form, NATURAL BORN KILLERS is treading
uncomfortably close to EVEN COWGIRLS GET THE BLUES territory, and
that's not a good place for a movie to be.
     As a satire on the media's infatuation with violence and
murderers, NATURAL BORN KILLERS hits the bullseye.  The problem is,
this is a one- note movie.  It repeatedly hammers home the same point
until the audience is bludgeoned into senselessness.  MAN BITES DOG
attacked the subject with more finesse and wit.
     Then there are the visuals--a virtual cornucopia of photographic
tricks.  Stone frequently switches not only from color to
black-and-white, but from one film stock to another.  He uses a variety
of angles and filters.  Animation, slow motion, fast motion, rear
screen projection--he doesn't miss a gimmick.  At times it becomes
difficult, if not impossible, to focus on the story with all that's
going on.
     Used sparingly, these sorts of devices can be very effective (see
ZENTROPA for an example).  Stone, however, doesn't know the meaning of
moderation or subtlety, and opts instead for something that is
excessive and self-indulgent.  It's as if he wants to shout out the
statement:  "Look at what I can do!  I'm an artist!"
     Ultimately, the story doesn't carry much importance.  Mickey
(Woody Harrelson) and Mallory (Juliette Lewis) are serial killers whose
wake is littered with fifty-two bodies.  They slaughter just about
anyone they meet, although at each massacre they leave behind a single
survivor.  The Law, in the person of Jack Scagnetti (a character
mentioned in Tarantino's RESERVOIR DOGS and played here by Tom
Sizemore), is after the pair, but with no more fervor than the media.
Spearheaded by Wayne Gayle (Robert Downey Jr.), AMERICAN MANIACS (a TV
program profiling serial killers) is hot on Mickey and Mallory's trail,
with ratings as the prize.
     The actors aren't much more crucial than the plot, dwarfed as they
are by the camerawork.  Everyone is over-the-top, especially Tommy Lee
Jones (as a sadistic warden) and Robert Downey Jr.  Woody Harrelson and
Juliette Lewis are adequate as Mickey and Mallory, although neither is
required to do anything more imposing than act out a comic-book like
character.
     There are some clever bits here and there.  The I LOVE MALLORY
sitcom parody (featuring Rodney Dangerfield and Edie McClurg) is
amusing--and a little sinister, especially considering how the laugh
track is manipulated.  The use of clips from old shows like LEAVE IT TO
BEAVER works, as do some of the animated inserts.  The soundtrack's
blend of more than seventy musical cues provides a balanced
counterpoint to the visual blitz.
     However, the good parts of this film, meager as they are, can't do
much to help.  Message or not, NATURAL BORN KILLERS is an example of
narcissistic film making.  Next time, Oliver, try to restrain
yourself-at least a little.
- James Berardinelli (blake7@cc.bellcore.com)

Author
Phineas Narco
     SCTV, the TV spoof comedy show out of Canada that ran for several
years in syndication, once tried to do a parody of Laverne & Shirley
and found that they just couldn't do it.  The show was already a parody
of itself.  This might be the case with Oliver Stone's new film NATURAL
BORN KILLERS, a movie that's sure to be the most controversial, and one
of the most lucrative, of the year.  It is also the most visually
inventive mainstream film to be released since Alan Parker's PINK
FLOYD-THE WALL.  Moreover, I think this movie will really polarize its
audience into those who think it's brilliant and those who think it's
garbage.
     In case you've been under a rock for the past month, NBK has been
hyped like crazy on television for over a month before its release.  It
concerns the adventures of Mickey and Mallory Knox (Woody Harrelson and
Juliette Lewis), two lovestruck free-spirited serial killers who go on
a three week rampage across America killing over 50 people before they
are brought to justice.  As bad as that sounds, Mickey and Mallory are
the only two likable characters in the picture!  They are surrounded
by scumbags ... Tom Sizemore as a sadistic cop hot on their tail, Robert
Downey Jr., an Australian Geraldo Rivera who would sell his soul for
ratings, Tommy Lee Jones as a sleazy prison warden, Rodney Dangerfield
as Mallory's perverted foul-mouthed father, all foils for the pure
love, and love of killing, that the death-dealing duo share.
     -LOVE THAT MALLORY:  Done in the style of a tv sitcom, a picture
of Mallory's horribly abusive home life complete with laughtrack and
arbitrarily bleeped profanities.  What's chilling about this is how much
*like* a sitcom it is ... the laugh cues are right on and we react to them
in the same way as we would a scene on CHEERS ... until we realize
something truly vile and sick is going on underneath the laughs.  This
is arguably the most effective sequence in the picture.
     -Perfectly timed "subliminals" ... someone says something to Mickey
that we know pisses him off and there's a short "cut" of a few frames
of a bleeding head screaming.  A brief peek of the rage within.
     -A cop murder captured live on television ... then a cut to the
Coca-Cola commercial with the smiling computer animated polar bears.
Talk about trivialization!
     Lewis and Harrelson do fine jobs considering the amount of special
effects they have to contend with.  There might be some Oscar
nominations in the offing here unless the Academy gets cold feet from
this controversial picture.
     One weak point of the film is that there really isn't any
exposition about how the public comes to love these two ... perhaps
they've been watching TV versions that give the killers the same
preferential treatment as this movie?
     Just about everyone they kill does something (at least in the mind
of a killer, or a moviegoer) to deserve it.  A cowboy dances vulgarly,
unwelcome with Mallory, a redneck trucker ogles her and talks to Mickey
vulgarly about what he'd like to do to her, a horny gas station
attendant tries to rape her, a waitress snaps rudely at her ... they're
all blown away ... and inside, more and more, we're cheering the killers
on.
     By the end of the movie, during the prison break, we're cheering
for the prisoners and escapees as they smash and kill their captors ...
rather like the gawkers on the overpass in LA cheering OJ Simpson 50
yard dash into the end zone.
     Much has been made about the fact that throughout the movie Stone
uses just about every special cinematic 'gimmick' in the book:  8mm,
lens filters, grainy black and white, jump cuts and flashbacks galore,
animation, morphing, pixelvision, front projection, rear projection,
video, subliminals, laughtracks, reverse-reverb, slow motion, super
slow-mo, claymation(?), time-lapse, double exposure ... to name only
the ones I recognized!  the film is a literal textbook of special film
technique and certainly it is the most prominent, even overwhelming,
aspect of the movie.  The average length of a shot would be interesting
to figure out.  I suspect it's probably under a second, maybe two at
the most.  Perhaps when this comes out on video Criterion Collection
will issue it on laserdisc in CAV format so that videophiles can check
it out literally frame by frame.  There is enough STUFF in this film
for ten films and to be frank it is frequently distracting.  While
watching this movie I found that I was so captivated by the astonishing
visuals I wasn't paying any attention to the characters, dialogue or
the plot.
     All this begs the question:  Why did Oliver Stone make his film
like this?  I have always been impressed by at least the *visuals* of
his movies even if I don't always agree with the ideas behind them.
JFK for example was a factual mess but technically brilliant.  But
Stone's smart enough guy to know that this movie would affect its
viewers in the way I described and I really believe that it's
intentional, as I'm sure a lot of people have figured out.  What he's
doing is caricaturizing American media...  offering forth the favorite
subject of the tabloid news circuit (serial killers) in the same kind
of quasi-real quick-cut flash and sparkle style of those same tabloid
news shows.  Stone seems to be saying "you want sensationalism?  You
want flashy visual gimmicks?  You want the STORY and not the reality?
Here!  Here it is in spades times ten!!"  The problem with this film's
reception with people who criticize it, I think, is they don't GET that
it's a spoof of media.  And understandably so!  Indeed, "news" nowadays
has gotten all too much like the style of NATURAL BORN KILLERS.  It's
hard to tell the caricature from the original and at first glance it
seems that Stone is just offering *more* of what he's purportedly
criticizing and spoofing.  The difference between what Stone offers and
what television offers is that Stone has a bigger budget and more time
to work on it.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS is visually assaultive, confusing,
violence-glorifying, over-the-top, pretentious, self-indulgent comic
book fairy tale.  But that's the point!
     There really is a fine line between what Stone has put together
here and what he's commenting on and spoofing.  Since media is becoming
more and more a parody of itself, parodying media is getting to be a
tricky business calling for the kind of extremities Stone explores
here.

Author
David Gregory Platt
     Oliver Stone's NATURAL BORN KILLERS is both less and more than
you'd expect.  Less in that the violence is not of the disgusting gore
variety that it's been trumped up as, and more in that disturbing
images and ideas are presented at a quick-cut, insane pace.
     The story is already famous, or infamous.  Micky (Woody
Harrelson) and Mallory (Juliette Lewis) Knox are two young,
charismatic outlaws who kill everybody that gets in their way (leaving,
of course, one behind to tell who did it).  Stone catches them midway
into their spree, with a freakish sceve in a roadside diner.  From
there, the carnage continues, with several road sequences in which Mick
and Mallory do little more than slaughter people and profess their love
for each other.
     The pair's story is taken up by Wayne Gale (Robert Downey Jr.),
host of the fictional trash TV show "American Maniacs" (think Geraldo
with a touch of Rupert Murdoch).  Having used tasteless remakes of the
two's crimes to great ratings reward, Gale inadvertently makes them
media heroes, with a worldwide following (one montage shows mall kids
from major capitols praising the pair as icons, lampooning the global
MTV mentality).
     In addition to the TV parodies, the movie is filmed in several
different stocks, from 16mm to regular film.  Intercut are flashes of
bizarre footage (everything from the famous eye from 2001 to
cheap-looking monsters and demons) that sometimes comment on the
action, sometimes not.  As well, the killers' odyssey through the
southwest is not always presented literally, but with strange rear
projection behind their vintage Dodge.  These techniques recalls
Stone's own JFK, in which the inserts and effects were used as visual
aids to otherwise dull pieces of evidence.  Here they are less
coherent, and seem to emerge from some bizarre shared mindset of Micky
& Mallory.
     Micky & Mallory are eventually tracked down by superstar cop Jack
Scagnetti (Tom Sizemore), who understands the psychopaths far too
well.  The capture is presented as an event predetermined by the media,
eerily predicting the O. J. Simpson hysteria (the film does feature an
obligatory O. J. reference, but no doubt this scene predates it.)
     The final sequence, with a live interview by Wayne Gale and a
subsequent prison riot, all shown live during the Superbowl, tends to
drag a bit.  Although Tommy Lee Jones adds color as a sneering warden,
the prison scenes are bogged down by the endless carnage and Micky's
speech explaining his philosophy.  It's hard to tell whether or not the
diatribe is satire: it's insane, but not too off the mark, and Stone
films it in the same solemn fashion as Kevin Costner's final remarks
in JFK.  Maybe Stone is lampooning himself.
     The multimedia technique is disorienting, but it's not new.  To
anyone who's ever seen a Guns 'N' Roses video, it's nothing you haven't
seen before.  It is so unrelenting that the movie's flow suffers for it
In his "Entertainment Weekly" review, Owen Glieberman suggested that it
denies Micky and Mallory "'reality.'" However, without this "reality,"
there's no point where you can latch hold and get into the story, so
instead it simply goes over you like an endless barrage.  What suffers
most are the TV parodies.  (There's nothing new to them, either:
stylistic parodies date back to MOBY DICK) The American Maniacs
sequence is shot through with pointless cuts to the black- and-white
footage.  It also ruins the illusion in the infamous sitcom scenes, in
which Mallory's horrific past with her abusive father (Rodney
Dangerfield) is presented on garish video and with a laughtrack.
     Dangerfield's performance leads the pack in a movie with some
strong, over-the-top satirical acting.  Dangerfield unleashes the
brutality that has been hiding in his comedy for a long time, and
essentially makes you forget the stunt casting apparent in the choice.
If Scorsese's watching, he should consider him for a mobster role.
Similarly, Harrelson erases all memories of his kindly persona on
"Cheers." Juliette Lewis is good as always (although she may be in
danger of being typecast as a female Travis Bickle type), and Tom
Sizemore plays Scagnetti as a perverse Scorsese thug (if that's
possible).  Tommy Lee Jones, representing a more banal evil than the
Knoxes, plays the warden as a hardened refugee from a '70s
crime-as-big-social-problem movie.  Russell Means, as an old Indian
Shaman, provides a small bit of gentle humour in the only natural,
human performance in the movie.  The only weak performance is by Robert
Downey, Jr., who hits too many wrong cartoonish notes.
     (A note about the music: instead of a musical score, the movie
features a mix of popular songs from Leonard Cohen to The Specials,
supervised by Nine Inch Nails frontman Trent Reznor.  The practise is
not as revolutionary as it's been touted, and has been done to much
better effect in GOODFELLAS, among others.)
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS is the first "critic-proof" art movie since
2001.  Simply put, those who don't itlike will be told they "don't
understand it."  However, unlike 2001, it's the director's ineptness,
not his skill, that makes it hard to understand.

Author
Ben Hoffman
     NBK opens in a cafe cum gas station in an isolated part of a
desert.  While Mallory Knox (Woody Harrelson) is sitting at the counter
ordering, his girl friend, Mickey, (Juliette Lewis) turns on the juke
box.  Dressed in a tiny bra top and sexy tight-fitting clothes she does
a little dance by herself.  When three locals come in, one of them
starts dancing with her but when he thinks he is going to make headway
with her she suddenly kicks him in the groin and the whole place turns
into a mass shootout.  And that's just the first scene.
     During the film we meet Mickey's father (Rodney Dangerfield) an
abuser of his daughter; Robert Downey, Jr., as the host of a TV show,
"American Maniacs" who will do anything for a story for his program;
Tommy Lee Jones as a tough prison warden.
     The pace of the movie is frantic.  Frequently you cannot hear the
dialogue ... everyone is shouting at once and the music is blaring ...
but the "feel" of the film comes through.  The idea is that the media
hypes killers into notoriety and that there are enough idiots in this
world who look up to the killers as if they were heroes.
     All through the film there are quick flashes of predators such as
a wolf, a polar bear, snakes: natural born killers.
     Despite the total violence, none of it is for the sake of showing
blood.  It is an innate part of the story of killers without
conscience.  Except for the last scene which I found unreal, the movie
is a spellbinder.  Remember how enthralled everyone was watching TV
while O. J. Simpson rode down the freeway with the police cars following
and the helicopters overhead?  Stone is not exaggerating and therein
lies the strength of the film.
     Exceptional acting by Juliette Lewis and Robert Downey, Jr.
Harrelson is good, too, but Tommy Lee Jones got a little too hopped up
in his role.

Author
John Walker
My form of "rating": After watching NATURAL BORN KILLERS, I felt sort
     of soiled; I wasn't sure what I'd been in contact with, but I was
     upset that it was contaminating the world.  Was that because
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS brought me in contact with the spirit of the
     "real" America?  Or was it because NATURAL BORN KILLERS brought me
     in contact with the mind of its director/co-writer Oliver Stone?
     I leave that up to you to decide.
     [A version of this review previously appeared in the December 1994
     issue of The Curmudgeon (4505 University Way, N.E., Box 555,
     Seattle WA 98105).]
     The story opens with Mickey and Mallory Knox (Woody Harrelson and
Juliette Lewis) at a roadside bar out in the great American desert
someplace.  Mallory puts a record on the jukebox and starts dancing
(well, writhing) to it.  A yokel joins in, and gets fresh.  So Mallory
starts beating him senseless as a prelude to killing him; she and
Mickey kill everyone in and around the bar, leaving only one alive to
tell the tale--and make sure their names are known.  Nice kids, huh?
     We then learn a little about them.  Mallory is the daughter of a
sleazo (Rodney Dangerfield) who used her for sex since who knows when.
Mickey apparently also has a history of molestation.  But the big thing
is that they love each other and kill everyone they meet.
     So, of course, they're big in the media, particularly with
"American Maniacs"--a tabloid TV show hosted by Wayne Gale (Robert
Downey, Jr.).  And they have zillions of fans world-wide.  As one
observes, no one wants to endorse mass murder--but if that's what you
*are*, then you'd certainly want to be Mickey and Mallory.
     When they're eventually captured, the media circus heats up even
more.  And after they're convicted, Gale will bring his show right to
the prison to interview them.
     I usually like to think in terms of the story, the characters, the
acting--who does what, when, and so forth, how much I liked this
character or that.  But NATURAL BORN KILLERS is one flick that
practically screams that those things are trivial.  The *story* is
subordinate to the *film*, and so is everything else.
     Take where we learn about about Mallory's Happy Home Life.  We get
it presented as a TV sitcom, with its own opening title, background
music, and laff track!  We get a family presided over by a real sicko
with an ineffectual wife (Edie McClurg), and the characters skate a
line between what might happen in reality and how it might be presented
by a sitcom as sick as Mallory's pop.
     And that, brothers and sisters, is a relatively *realistic*
element of NATURAL BORN KILLERS!  Throughout, we get every film-school
trick imaginable, every possible dredging of symbolism.  When Mickey
and Mallory are in a motel room, say, there'll be rear-projection
images showing film clips from World War II, from Westerns, from
perhaps Mickey's childhood, from sitcoms.  Periodically during the
film, a character will flash on the screen drenched in blood, or
banners will be projected onto the characters, labeling them demons or
whatnot.
     The film will switch from color to grainy video black and white,
to shots at any angle that strikes the director's fancy.  When we see
the TV news following Mickey and Mallory's travels, it may be sort of
documentary style.  Or it may be inserted into a 50s advertizement of a
family dressed up, surrounding the TV--all black and white except for
the news story on the little screen in color.
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS is a film that insists, that screams, that
"*Every* frame is *filled* with *meaning*!  (You have to say that right
-- intensely, showing your commitment, your *sensitivity*--dwell on
each word: "*filled* with *meaning*".  Practice it.)
     OK.  So what's the meaning?  That people who grow up watching
"Leave It to Beaver" are going (if male) to rape their kids?  Or (if
female) to do nothing while hubby does so?
     OK, so let's ignore the surreal stuff for a moment.  How's about
"satire"?
     OK, I guess I can call it satire.  We're assured by the press kit,
and a sermonette from Stone, that this is a "satire on violence and the
American media".
     Mickey and Mallory are clearly presented as creeps, but at least
we get some idea why.  Other than them (with one quasi-exception),
there is no one (repeat: no one) for whom the film gives us any
substantial reason to be sympathetic.  The people killed on screen are
all either: 1) ciphers, complete unknowns, just momentary faces; 2)
dorks and yokels; or 3) creeps and sickos of various varieties.
     The one quasi-exception is an Indian (Russell Means).  He may be a
sympathetic character, but he's hardly part of the ordinary world.  He
speaks no English, has visions, and rattlesnakes don't bite him.  (He
has a grandson, who also speaks no English, to ask him questions, so
that the subtitled conversation can fill us in on mystical details.)
Means projects a nice, stable, laid-back character--but one who is
clearly meant not to be part of 1990s America.
     America is the hordes yearning for Mickey and Mallory to off more
nobodies.
     (Ollie Stone's not anti-American, though.  The whole *world* joins
in the fascination--particularly those silly, air-headed Japanese.)
     Lined up against Mickey and Mallory, the forces of Law and Order
are not exactly Marshall Dillon.  Jack Scagnetti (Tom Sizemore), who's
tracking them, is a self-promoting hack.  He has, let's say, a certain
desire to dominate women.  Warden Dwight McCluskey (Tommy Lee Jones)
must go to the same hair stylist that does Ace Ventura, Pet Detective.
(McCluskey might not be realistic enough for that flick, however.)
     Well, if this is satire, it's about the level one would expect
from a high-school or freshman writing class.  Except that high-school
kids might actually have fun making everyone look like total jerks.
     Oliver Stone does not appear to be having fun.  This is serious
business.  The promos make it all too clear that NATURAL BORN KILLERS
is a Statement, a Warning to America.
     All right, let's give Stone his Statement.  He has obviously
absorbed pop culture, and turned it on its head.  Time after time,
Mickey and Mallory are in situations much like those in teen flicks and
sitcoms.  But in those flicks, the hero or heroine might sock or slap
somebody, or just throw back a snappy one-liner.  In NATURAL BORN
KILLERS, they kill somebody.  But because of our complete lack of
identification with the victims, the killings are "distant"--without
any impact except as devices to move the action along.
     So, it certainly looks like Stone wants us to enjoy this on a
superficial level.  Then, presumably, when we look back, we'll see that
we, too, have been sucked into the whole pop culture of death and
slaughter.  And we'll repent.
     Doesn't this sound vaguely familiar?
     Particularly on film, wasn't a lot of soft-core porno written and
marketed this way?  Filled with "oh the shame" and "warnings to youth"?
     I think that NATURAL BORN KILLERS has been misrepresented as a
satire of the media.  As I said, *everybody* in the film is a creep;
the media types are merely *celebrity* creeps--just like Mickey and
Mallory.
     But it would be fun to analyze NATURAL BORN KILLERS as a critique
of the media, since the film is so self-referential.  The old soft-core
marketing schtick is merely one aspect to look at.  Don't the
tabloid-TV types tell us how opposed they are to what they're hyping?
I think it would be interesting to examine NATURAL BORN KILLERS to see
to what extent it can be criticized as being what Stone claims to
satirize and condemn.
     Unfortunately, though, after reading Stone my thoughts turned to
something darker than the usual media incompetence and
self-righteousness.
     Throughout NATURAL BORN KILLERS, one explanation of Mickey and
Mallory is "fate".  We are bombarded with the past as backdrop to the
present.  Mickey himself states it expressly: He and Mallory are just
Natural Born Killers.  Their unremitting violence is fated.  Virtually
all those who were killed surely had something dark enough in their
past that they deserved to be butchered.
     Maybe Stone is just giving Mickey some slimy self-justification.
But those ideas are almost nowhere contradicted and sometimes
explicitly affirmed by the film.  To the extent the film offers us an
out, it is that "Love beats the demon".  Stone himself cites this line,
saying that "I do believe there is love at the end."
     *But what about the killings?*  For at least a hundred years,
certain voices have announced a fascination with violence--that
violence alone can cleanse us of the things that drag us down.  That
humanity can rise above its grubby little present only by passing
through a river of blood, a wall of fire.  Those who kill--joyously
and without restraint--will rise purer and stronger than any before
them.  They will be triumphant--purged, redeemed, the truly innocent
and free, truly capable of love and exultation.
     Stone, immediately after citing the "love beats the demon" line,
closes his sermon with:

Author
Michael J. Legeros
Directed by Oliver Stone
Written by David Veloz, Richard Rutowski, and Oliver Stone from a story
           by Quentin Tarantino
Cast Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr., Tommy Lee Jones,
     Tom Sizemore, Rodney Dangerfield
MPAA Rating     "R" (Duh)
Running Time    130 Minutes
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS is an acquired taste, make no mistake.  Good,
bad, *and* ugly, Oliver Stone's hilarious satire on media
sensationalism is a kaleidoscope portrait of America as seen through
the eyes of someone on a bad acid trip.
     Expanding upon the narrative techniques employed in JFK, Stone
uses every trick in the book to tell the story of Mickey and Mallory
(Harrelson and Lewis), two Bonnie-and-Clyde serial killers who capture
the hearts of non-victims all across America.
     With his crack team of collaborators and a year's worth of
editing, Stone has mixed 35mm, Super 8, animation, rear projection,
slow-motion, fast-motion, and video with a dazzling array of stock
footage, film clips, and other assorted images.  The effect is all at
once impressive, overpowering, and, well, aimless.
     The multimedia tricks are a hallucinatory treat, for sure, but the
director uses them on *every* character in the film--not just Mickey
and Mallory.  The result is sledgehammer saturation, if you will, that
weighs the film down by the end.  Simply, it gets old.
     Acting credits are superb, though, even if the characters
(literally) resemble cartoons.
     Harrelson and Lewis are a match made in movie heaven, with Woody
exhibiting some scary signs of intelligence.  Tommy Lee Jones is a
riot, sporting slick hair and Carl Perkins sideburns to play a prison
warden.  Tom Sizemore has a field day overacting as the
bad-cop-gone-worse hired by Mr. Jones to arrange an "accident" for
Mickey and Mal.
     And give some respect to Rodney Dangerfield, perfectly cast as
Mallory's father.  He gets his in a hilarious flashback staged as a
sitcom.
     The story was written by Quentin Tarantino (RESERVOIR DOGS, PULP
FICTION) and that's obvious.  Bullets fly, body parts are eviscerated,
and everyone says f*** every other word.  Heck, the fact that this orgy
of violence came from a major studio, alone is reason enough to see
it!  Listen for a great exchange between Jones and Sizemore--including
a hilarious off-color Oswald joke!--late in the film.
     Rewrites came from three others, including Stone who, undoubtedly,
was responsible for a slightly strange midsection involving an Indian
mystic and his rattlesnakes.  Shades of THE DOORS?  Rewriting also
added the entire commentary that culminates in a short montage of Amy
Fisher, O. J. Simpson, and Tonya Harding landing square on her
Buttafuoco.

Author
Scott Renshaw
Starring:  Woody Harrelson, Juliette Lewis, Robert Downey Jr., Tom
Sizemore, Tommy Lee Jones.
Screenplay:  David Veloz, Richard Rutowski and Oliver Stone.
Director:  Oliver Stone.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Few filmmakers in the last twenty years have so consistently had
so little to say as loudly as Oliver Stone.  By pairing up his
single-note self-righteousness with cinematic histrionics, Stone has
managed to create a controversial body of work which dazzles with its
visual inventiveness even as it clubs you insensible with its strident
moralizing.  NATURAL BORN KILLERS is the natural culmination of this
style/message schism, a gutsy and gaudy assault on the senses that
forgets to bring along a single original or insightful thought.  Even
the dynamic performances of Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis can't
salvage this busy mess.
     Harrelson and Lewis star as Mickey and Mallory Knox, a pair of
happy-go-lucky lovebirds who happen to be in the middle of a massive
killing spree when first we meet them.  Both are the result of deeply
dysfunctional families, and with little moral awareness they cut a path
of death through the Southwest.  Eventually they are captured, and
become the objects of a media frenzy and a cult of personality.  Most
eager to cash in on this fame is Wayne Gale (Robert Downey Jr.) the
hose of a tabloid television program called "American Maniacs."  He
sets up a live interview with Mickey on Super Bowl Sunday, destined to
be a ratings bonanza.  The one hitch in the plan is a riot at the
prison, which turns into a nationally televised bloodbath.
     The first hour of NATURAL BORN KILLERS is made watchable only by
the intensity of the two stars.  Woody Harrelson stretches himself as
never before, his simpleton charm connecting to a genuine amorality,
while Juliette Lewis takes her wounded white-trash act from KALIFORNIA
and runs with it, exploding at arbitrary moments into astonishing
ferocity.  But for all their sound and fury, Mickey and Mallory aren't
really characters.  They're ciphers, stick-figure representations of a
societal ill, and ciphers just aren't all that interesting.  The
technical flotsam and jetsam surrounding them can't disguise that fact,
and only the positively inspired segment casting Mallory's home life as
a twisted 1950s sitcom goes anywhere beneath the surface.  As it nears
its mid-point, Mickey and Mallory's road show becomes extremely
tedious.
     The prison-based second half of NATURAL BORN KILLERS is something
of an improvement, if only for the inclusion of some delightfully
bug-eyed acting by Tommy Lee Jones as the prison warden and Tom
Sizemore as the brutal cop who arrested Mickey and Mallory.  As
over-the-top as they are, they seem at least remotely grounded in
humanity, unlike our surreal chauffeurs through the netherworld.
Again, however, Stone falls victim to the One Obvious Idea syndrome.
"Look at what the media has done to us," he says with genuine shock
and, of course, superiority.  "Any of us could become like Mickey and
Mallory."  The problem is that it's the same idea that drove MAN BITES
DOG.  And KALIFORNIA.  And SERIAL MOM, for that matter.  And every one
of those films told the same story better, without pumping steroids
into the production.  There is no satire to the excesses of NATURAL
BORN KILLERS, because Oliver Stone has no idea how to achieve that
level of subtlety.  It's simply a freak show, and Stone comes off
looking like a colossal hypocrite attempting to cash in on exactly what
he spends two hours clucking his tongue at.
     If NATURAL BORN KILLERS had been made by any other director, I
might have given it grudging support simply for having the courage to
run to the limit in its audacious originality.  Unfortunately, I have
lost all patience with Stone's pedantry-as-art approach to filmmaking.
Compare the first hour of NATURAL BORN KILLERS with David Lynch's WILD
AT HEART, which leavened its shock value with a warped sense of humor
and simmering menace, and you'll see that what Stone attempted to
accomplish could have been done right.  Instead, NATURAL BORN KILLERS
is like getting a lecture from your parents during a particularly bad
acid trip.  You just want it to stop.

Author
Jeffrey Graebner
     No matter what you think of the content of his films, it is hard
to deny Oliver Stone is one of the most innovative mainstream
filmmakers in Hollywood.  Few directors are as consistently willing to
take major chances.  With NATURAL BORN KILLERS, he has created a film
that is unlike any other movie ever made.  Some people are going to
absolutely love the film and others are going to absolutely hate it.
Far more are going to be left exhausted, bewildered, and generally
undecided about whether or not it worked.  I fit into the latter
category.
     The first half of this mostly plotless film is a warped road
picture as we follow mass-murderers Mickey and Mallory Knox (played by
Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis) as they go on a rampage committing
one violent murder after another.  About half-way through, Mickey and
Mallory are captured at which point this turns into a bizarre prison
film.  Much of the action in the last half revolves around a
unscrupulous reporter (played by Robert Downey Jr.) who will do pretty
much anything for a prison interview with Mickey, a borderline crazy
prison warden (played by Tommy Lee Jones), and the corrupt police
detective (played by Tom Sizemore) who captured Mickey and Mallory.
     All of these characters are written and played so completely over
the top that they are essentially live-action cartoons.  Very little
effort is expended trying to develop any motivation for the behavior of
the characters.  Other than a couple very brief flashes of childhood
memory, nothing is told about Mickey's background.  An early flashback
sequence does give us a little background into Mallory's childhood, but
it is one of the most bizarre movie sequences in recent memory.  The
whole thing is shot like a TV sitcom (including a laugh track) with her
abusive father played by Rodney Dangerfield and her weak mother played
by Edie McClurg.  Dangerfield and McClurg play the characters like
typical sitcom parents, except for Dangerfield's occasional tendency to
verbally, physically, and sexually abuse his daughter.
     The whole movie is so intensely stylized and throws so many
cinematic tricks at us that this flashback sequence doesn't even seem
particularly out of place.  In fact, I'm not sure that much of
*anything* could seem out of place in this movie.  The audio/visual
style of this movie is virtually impossible to describe.  It basically
has to be seen to be believed.  Stone uses virtually every conceivable
type of film stock and photography, even throwing in bits of animation
on occasion.  Scenes constantly switch from color to black and white
and from 8mm to 16mm to 35mm.  The viewer is rarely given the
opportunity to begin to digest an image before something completely
different is up on the screen.  The overall result is a sensation of
constant chaos, but it is also virtually impossible to take your eyes
off the screen.  It is simultaneously exhausting and exhilarating.
     It all may seem virtually random on first glance, but in truth I
suspect that every frame of this film is carefully crafted and
deliberate.  This is definitely a film that primarily came together in
the editing room.  The whole movie is full of rapid cuts and all kinds
of abstract imagery.  Special effects are often used to combine
seemingly unrelated images on the screen all at once.  Oliver Stone has
never been known for subtlety and much of the symbolism here is
extremely obvious.  In particular, the frequent use of snakes is rather
unsubtle.  Still, this film is a major achievement in cinema editing
and if this film fails to win the "Best Editing" Oscar, then the
Academy simply isn't paying attention.
     The actors all seem to be given little restraints on their
performances.  Harrelson, Lewis, and Jones are essentially playing
their standard screen personas here, but in a highly exaggerated
manner.  Harrelson plays Mickey as if Woody from "Cheers" finally
snapped and became violent.  This is the dark side of the simple-minded
hick that he has been playing for years.  Lewis plays another of her
sweet-looking oddballs.  She is petite and soft-spoken, making it all
the more shocking when she suddenly becomes violent.  Finally, Tommy
Lee Jones has seemed to constantly be on the verge of going
out-of-control in his last few roles.  This time, he is finally allowed
to cross that line.  As you might expect, he is a lot of fun to watch.
     Robert Downey Jr. gives the most entertaining performance in the
film as the reporter.  His character is the most fully formed in the
film and is generally the only one that changes much in the film
(although not necessarily for the better).  Most importantly, he is
given most of the best lines in the film which he delivers with a great
deal of finesse.  On top of all that, he plays the character with a very
convincing Australian accent (although I never was quite sure *why*).
     One significant way in which this movie differs from Stone's past
work is the fact that it is primarily done as satire.  The film
actually is very funny, although much of the laughter is nervous
laughter.  Sometimes you may even feel slightly guilty about what you
are laughing at.  The script contains quite a bit of witty dialog, most
of which is given to Robert Downey Jr.
     Much has been made about the amount of violence in this film.  It
certainly *is* an incredibly violent film and is very much deserving of
its R rating.  Much of the violence is really more implied than
explicit, though, and the rapid editing means that the violent acts
(and their results) are never really on the screen long.  I suspect
that a lot of people will come away from this film thinking that it was
a lot more graphic than it really is.  Still, this is probably not a
movie for the extremely squeamish.
     The one big question that may remain with many viewers after
seeing this movie is what the film is really trying to say.  While the
two films couldn't be more different in content, I suspect that the
reactions to this film may be similar to some of the reactions people
have had to FORREST GUMP.  Like that film, NATURAL BORN KILLERS has a
relatively simple and obvious message on the surface.  This basic
message is about the fact that the media tends to glorify violence and
make celebrities out of criminals.  Unfortunately, the film really has
little of substance to say on this matter.  As a result, many may find
the movie to be shallow.  On the other hand, some people may read
meanings into the film that other people simply don't see.  I suspect
that many people will be left with feelings that are so abstract that
they are virtually impossible to articulate.  I'm left with the strong
feeling that there is a lot more to this movie than meets the eye, but
I really don't know how I can sufficiently explain that fact to someone
else (particularly if they don't see it themselves).
     NATURAL BORN KILLERS is one of the most audacious and original
films to come along in a long time.  It is a two-hour assault on the
senses which will likely leave audiences simultaneously dazzled and
confused.  It is an impressive film that is likely going to generate a
ton of varied reactions and debate.

Author
Jerry Saravia
"Natural Born Killers" is the kind of over-the-top nonsense only Oliver Stone 
could make. He is a brilliant director and, throughout his fine career, has 
crafted fine films  such as "J.F.K," "Wall Street," "Platoon," "Talk Radio" 
and "Born on the Fourth of July." "Natural Born Killers" may be his weakest 
film by far and his most self-indulgent, a film where he claims to have not 
censored himself. Nothing in Stone's kaleidoscopic imagery from "The Doors" 
can begin to describe the superfluous flourishes of what is essentially the 
most controversial film of 1994. 
The "Killers" in this movie are two white-trash kids named Mickey and 
Mallory, played respectively by Woody Harrelson and Juliette Lewis. The 
blonde-haired, vicious Mickey is in prison for grand theft auto but he still 
has the hots for the young, sexy, alluring Mallory Knox who frequently visits 
him in prison. Through pure intervention or "fate" (Mickey's own philosophy), 
he escapes from prison on horseback during a tornado and proceeds to rescue 
Mal from her vile parents by murdering them. How vile? Porcine Rodney 
Dangerfield plays Mallory's incestuous, blubbering wrestling fanatic of a 
father who is beaten to death and drowned (the mother is tied to a bed and 
burned to a crisp and Mal's brother is left as the sole survivor). After this 
already cartoonish sequence of violence, the two lovebirds go on the run, get 
married by an enormous New Mexico gorge, and indulge in a murderous spree all 
around the West killing at least fifty people. Naturally, Mickey and Mallory 
are branded as celebrities by another cruel force of nature, the media! The 
two killers are depicted as sexy criminals admired by globally by 
desensitized twentysomething fools who call them, "the best thing to happen 
to the media since Charles Manson." One grungy character ironically admits 
that if he were a serial killer, he would be Mickey and Mallory!
The Bonnie and Clyde pair are eventually caught by a crazed cop/writer, Jack 
Scagnetti (Tom Sizemore) who specializes in writing about the minds of serial 
killers and in breaking women's necks. Tommy Lee Jones is the prison warden 
who is nearly as loony as any inmate in his prison where M and M are kept. 
And let's not forget Robert Downey Jr. as Wayne Gayle, an Australian TV host 
for the high-rated show "American Maniacs," who is eager to interview Mickey 
in a live special after the Super Bowl in the hopes of beating the ratings 
for the infamous Manson trial. This all ends in pure fire and fury during an 
eerily effective, blood-on-the-walls prison riot climax that remains the most 
horrifying footage Stone has ever shot on film. 
I must say that I hated "Natural Born Killers" when I first saw it in a 
theatre in August of 1994. I knew the reactions of the primarily young 
audience in the theatre - who laughed and cheered at Mickey's actions during 
a particularly vicious opening sequence - was a definite sign of how times 
were changing. 1994 was the year where "Pulp Fiction," released a month 
later, changed film forever with its portrait of criminal antiheroes as the 
protagonists to root for. With "Natural Born Killers," the visual style is 
what bothered me the most initially. I could not sit still and watch such 
disorienting images coming in at a faster clip per second than say the 
bullets of a gun. I gave it a second chance much later on video and I can say 
that it is not as visually exhausting as it was in theatres. There are 
performances that stand out amidst all the noise. For example, Tom Sizemore 
does a marvelous job of balancing sorrow and sheer apathy for his character 
Jack, who grows more and more attached to the wild Mallory. Robert Downey Jr. 
is hilarious and pathetic as the loquacious TV host who will do anything for 
higher ratings, even if it means killing people himself. There are also some 
volatile turns by Joe Spinelli and Pruitt Taylor Vince as the warden's most 
trusted guards. 
What works to a lesser degree is Tommy Lee Jones, overacting as much as 
anyone else in the movie - a simply cartoonish character who would be at home 
in a Road Runner short. It is hard to remove the memory of Woody Harrelson 
from TV's "Cheers" - he appears to be too nice to play such a rough character 
like Mickey. Harrelson does try and there is a nicely underplayed scene where 
he is interviewed by Downey and claims his rather unbelievable reasons for 
bloodletting (all based on the words of Charles Manson during an infamous 
Geraldo Rivera interview). 
Mallory is played superbly by Juliette Lewis and she certainly stands out the 
most in Stone's universe. She manages to make Mallory into a beautiful, 
believably scary and sometimes sweet monster almost ready to explode at any 
moment. Lewis is so good and inhabits the movie so often that becomes the 
soul center of the amoral world of this movie. This performance was so 
unusual for Lewis considering she's played mostly ordinary girlish types in 
films like "What's Eating Gilbert Grape" - the closest in proximity to 
Mallory is Lewis's role in "Kalifornia" and a TV movie she did with Brad Pitt 
called "Too Young to Die." Her work in "Natural Born Killers" will long be 
remembered, especially when she memorably utters "How sexy do you think I am 
now punk?" before brutally pounding an overzealous male. Lewis's appearance 
changes dramatically from short black hair to long blonde wigs, and she also 
wears cowboy hats, outlandish dresses, and bright red lipstick complete with 
a dangling cigarette. 
Part of Oliver Stone's problem is that he has no idea of how to direct a 
satire or to steer it in the right direction - he is just out to thrill us. A 
satire can makes it points truly through exaggeration but also through 
pointed black humor. Consider Stanley Kubrick's anti-violent masterpiece "A 
Clockwork Orange" which is done with far more subtlety and restraint. One can 
argue that "Natural Born Killers" is not meant to be a satire but a mere 
condemnation of our media-obsessed world where killing is a stepping stone to 
celebritism on the same wavelength as movie stars. But even an outright 
condemnation needs a little breath of air or else you end up cancelling 
yourself out - you can't fire with fire. Stone has made a desensitized movie 
about desensitized killers and has filled the canvas with lots of cartoonish 
violence - the sort of violence one would associate with an Arnold 
Schwarzeneger movie not an Oliver Stone flick. The violence is silly and 
trivial with none of the reality evident in Stone's hard-hitting war films 
such as "Platoon" or "Born on the Fourth of July." Sure, it is a movie about 
amoral killers in a typically amoral, devalued society but such rampant 
amorality would have served Ollie better as a sharp character study. 
Amorality is all that represents Mickey and Mallory, and what saves them in 
the end is love ("Love beats the demon.") They are essentially romantic 
rebels wronged by society for acting out their fantasy of a post-modern road 
movie where killers kill and get away with it. Since every other character in 
the film is as nasty and dehumanized as they are (particularly Scagnetti and 
the warden), then it is difficult not to empathize with Mickey and Mallory. 
This point-of-view was represented by Kubrick's "Clockwork Orange" but not to 
the degree that Stone's film does. After all, "Clockwork's" killer 
protagonist Alex is far more human and clever than all the cartoonish types 
in this film, and thus a thematically richer film dealing with the nature of 
violence and how it can't be controlled. 
Visually, Oliver Stone is on a dizzying mind trip as he continually shifts 
our point-of-view using everything from color to black-and-white to color 
negatives, scratchy film, 35mm, 16mm, video and stylized animation in various 
film stocks and speeds. These shifts in images are not sparingly used - they 
usually occur within one specific scene. The editing is brilliant, the 
filmmaking is dazzling (courtesy of noted cinematographer Robert Richardson), 
yet the overall effect is nauseating (there are reportedly 3,000 images in 
the entire film). If Ollie chose to use this breakthrough editing technique 
less frequently, then his various opinions of Mickey, Mallory and the media 
would have beem more fully realized.
The best scenes in "Natural Born Killers" are the quiet ones where Stone 
allows motion to move smoothly without bludgeoning the camera. I love the 
scene after the ultraviolent cafe attack where Mallory dances on top of a car 
(to the tune of Cowboy Junkies' version of Lou Reed's "Sweet Jane") and 
superimposed images of angels, red horses, and bright colored lights flash 
by. There is also the masterfully edited and composed scene where Mickey and 
Mallory declare their love for each other by a bridge overlooking a gorge. 
They make a blood pact, eschewing the traditional wedding engagement, and 
their blood trickles into the water in animation style forming twin serpents 
(a recurring motif in the film). 
After having seen "Natural Born Killers" twice, I am convinced that Stone's 
grandiose visions are spectacular to watch but storywise, the film is 
interestingly muddled. I recommend the experience of watching this film but 
only as a visual odyssey of rampant images, a crosscutting style of excess. 
It is a film I am not able to take off my mind, and everyone will read it 
differently. Some will see it as a dangerous polemic of our times and others 
will see it as the very same trashy exploitative violence that Stone was only 
pretending to skewer. It makes you wonder how one should view this film when 
we are asked to root for the remorseless killers.
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at 
http://moviething.com/members/movies/faust/JATMindex.shtml 
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at Faust668@aol.com or 
at faustus_08520@yahoo.com
